Very few of them are X-linked and matrilinear.
Autosomal recessive inheritance is difficult to be assessed in an evidence-based setting.
By linkage analysis, several loci, but no disease gene, have been identified.
At present, few cases of familial dilated cardiomyopathy can benefit of a molecular diagnosis.
As the results of the structural reform policy regulating the health care sector, the paper presents the possible path of increasing intrasectoral risk selection and intersectoral risk externalization (especially between the law of health care insurance, the law of statutory nursing inusrance, and the German poverty law).
Particularly the new developments in the hospital sector will be analzyed regarding the dynamics of risk selection and risk externalization.
The new economic ways of financing the hospital sector are inducing the need of systematic integration of the different branches of social law, especially more developed networks of the health care, the nursing system, and the social care services.
Purpose: The inactive form of pyruvatekinase could be established in different tumours.
Purpose of this study was to demonstate the presence or absence of the inactive form of pyruvatekinase in renal cell carcinoma, metastases and benign renal tissue by immunohistology.
Introduction: The hemodynamic parameters of 95 patients undergoing maxillary or bimaxillary orthognathic surgery in 1996 and 1997 at the Department of OMF Surgery/Plastic Surgery, Krefeld, Germany, were analyzed retrospectivly to study the effect of intraoperative blood loss.
Materials and methods: The parameters included the blood loss volume, age, weight and sex of the patients, the mode of osteotomy and the operation time, the surgeon, the average blood pressure, the infusion volume, the anesthesiologist, the thrombocyte counts and their function, the activity of the coagulation factors II, V, VII, VIII, IX, X, XI, XII, XIII and von-Willebrand-factor, and the pathological coagulation factor counts of each patient, the rate of autologous blood donation and the rate of retransfusion.
Statistical analysis was done using the Speraman-Rho-test.
Results: The average blood loss during maxillary osteotomy was 670  +/-  380 ml and during bimaxillary surgery 1120  +/-  510 ml.
Men lost about 300 ml more than women.
Operations of more than 3.5 h in length led to a blood loss of 1200  +/-  520 ml as opposed to 670  +/-  310 ml.
The average blood loss among various surgeons was between 670 ml and 1180 ml of various anesthesiologists between 730 ml and 1200 ml, without statistical evidence.
Some 17.9% of patients showed pathological thrombocytic function concerning medication with aspirin; 34.7% had pathological activities of coagulation factors, but only 2.1% with clinical significance.
Conclusion: Mode of operation, maxillary or bimaxillary, und length of operation were the most significant factors of intraoperative blood loss.
Patients with pathological coagulation had nearly the same rate of blood loss as patients with physiological coagulation.
In most cases this was determined by restriction of aspirin.
Analysis of the rate of autologous blood retransfusion showed a significant correlation to blood loss in bimaxillary surgery.
Maxillary osteotomy led to a retransfusion of only 14.2% of autologous blood unit.
This should be reviewed critically especially concerning costs.
Purpose: Course and pathophysiology of a typical syndrome after irradiation of the cauda equina were studied.
Wells' syndrome (eosinophilic cellulitis) is a rare inflammatory skin disease of unknown etiology and pathogenesis.
Only 18 cases in childhood have been reported.
We report on a 5-year-old girl who showed the typical biphasic and recurrent course of the disease: initially edematous-cellulitic lesions associated with blisters, followed by morphea-like changes on the extremities.
Eosinophilia of peripheral blood was apparent, which, however, was not correlated with the severity of the current condition.
After a recurrent course for 4 months and intermittent systemic administration of antibiotics (on the assumption of erysipelas and phlegmon) and glucocorticosteroids, the disease healed without sequelae.
Trigger factors or systemic hematologic malignancy could not be detected.
Diskussion: Wells' syndrome is probably more common than believed and should be included in the differential diagnosis of urticarial, morphea-like and bullous eruptions in childhood.
In 1996, several employees of the French governmental organization for Blood Collection and Transfusions (CNTS) have been condemned by ordinary courts.
They were found guilty in the affair on HIV-infected blood transfusions.
Over 3800 persons, mostly hemophiliacs, have been infected in France and suffer from HIV disease.
Many of them died already.
The public in France urgently demanded the condemnation of the persons who were politically responsible for the time delay that postponed the introduction of HIV-tests for blood donations in France.
Such a test was available from the american company ABBOTT in the early 1985, but the french authorities preferred to wait for the HIV-Test from Pasteur-Diagnostics.
A special court, the "Court de Justice de la République", authorized to judge on members of  the governement, has been created by the French Parliament on Nov. 23, 1993.
Six years later, the three politicians, the former Prime Minister Laurent Fabius, the minister for  Social Affairs, Mme Georgina Dufoix, and  her undersecretary of state for health, Mr.  Edmond Hervé, have been accused of involuntary homicide.
March, 9, 1999, after five weeks of deliberations and statements, the CJR rendered his sentence: The former Prime Minister Laurent Fabius and the Minister  G. Dufoix were discharged, but the secretary of state for health, Edmond Hervé, has been declared guilty.
However, also Mr. Hervé could leave the court room as a free person, because the President of the Court, Mr. Christian Le Gunehec, didn't want to pronounce a judgement against him, as Mr. Hervé had to suffer from almost 15 years of public  critics and attacks before he was found guilty.
The hemophiliacs and other AIDS-patients as well as their families protested loudly against this judgement.
They plan to file charges against the three ministers through a common court to hold them responsible.
Classical insight therapy, derived from Freud, and `maternal' holding therapy, derived from Balint, Winnicott and others, are two contrasting treatment techniques in psychoanalysis.
The authors believe that each of these two techniques presupposes specific philosophical basic assumptions about the nature of human beings.
The position of Freud is that of the basically traumatic character of human experience.
The contra-position of the object relation psychologists stipulates the priority of love in human experience.
These assumptions seem to be more latent than overt guidelines of therapeutical techniques and therefore their reconstruction and reformulation have important implications for psychoanalytical therapy.
Univentricular hearts represent rare complex cardial malformations.
We report a case of a 34-year old male with single ventricle, two atria, tricuspid atresia, large atrial septal defect, complete transposition and pulmonary valvar stenosis.
There were no signs of chronic pulmonary hypertension.
Intensive clinical analysis of the cardiac malformation was first performed at the age of five years.
Conclusion was that the patient would have no benefit from operation.
The patient had nearly normal live conditions with a profession, family and some sportive activities like squash.
He died of sudden cardiac death.
The malformation was examined by sequential segmental analysis and in comparison with the embryonic development.
Clinical picture, prognosis and therapy are reported from literature.
During the last years development of cardiac surgery achieved good results.
Special morphologic constellations, as in our case, may be the reason that conservative therapy can be sufficient for prolonged survival with good quality of life.
The assessment and measurement of pain is essential in the implementation and control of pain relieving strategies.
The measurement of pain in infants and children should be based on the consideration of age, cognitive level, psychological status, intercurrent diseases and the social context in order to register the child's individual situation and to avoid misinterpretation.
From its origin to its death the human organism is submitted to functional, material and morphological changes that are perceptible.
These changes permit classifying an individual as young, adult, old, active or infirm.
But this estimation is not always correct.
Some appear younger, some older than expected from their chronological age.
But what is ageing and how can it be measured?
For this, so-called markers or biological markers of ageing are used which are measurable indicators of ageing in live organisms.
A description of the complexity, the asynchronous course and the biological variety and variability of biological age is less successful with a single indicator than with the inclusion of several markers in a multi-factorial measuring system, in a so-called test battery.
Various test batteries have already been applied in numerous studies that consist of biochemical scans, mental and also social parameters in different combinations.
A more precise description of such a test battery can be seen in the following discussion of the ILSE study.
The documentation form for pathohistologic findings (version III) for tumors of the maxillofacial region is presented.
It is part of the site-specific documentation of the German Association of Tumor Centers (ADT).
Its handling is explained by instructions which are based on the ICD-O classification and the TNM system.
The prognostic relevance of the standardized documentation has already been proven by various histomorphologic investigations concerning oral and oropharyngeal cancer.
By means of a multicentric observational study the German Austrian Swiss co-operative group DÖSAK will develop a new prognostic model for oral and oropharyngeal cancer.
The development of a middle ear cholesteatoma is usually associated with chronic inflammation and displacement of the mucosa present by the invading squamous epithelium.
To analyze the clinically different behaviors of both epithelia, we used immunohistochemical methods to study the distribution and expression of interleukin-1 (Il-1), transforming growth factor-alpha (TGF-), epidermal growth factor (EGF), epidermal growth factor-receptor (EGF-R), the proliferation marker MIB 1, c-myc proto-oncogene product and activation marker 4F2.
Results stromal that keratinocytes in a cholesteatoma exhibited a much higher activation and proliferation rate when compared to middle ear mucosa cells.
Middle ear epithelial cells showed no immunoreactivity for TGF-alpha, EGF-R, Il-1 and c-myc in contrast to the markedly positive immunoreactivity found in cholesteatoma matrix.
The local release of cytokines and growth factors, such as TGF-alpha, EGF and Il-1 by inflammatory cells seems to be an important factor for the hyperproliferative behavior of cholesteatoma epithelium.
Our findings could contribute to the pathogenesis of middle ear cholesteatoma and give a possible explanation for the sustained progression of its growth leading to displacement of the middle ear mucosa.
The role of hip sonography in neonatal hip screening is still a controversial matter.
This paper reports the results of the Austrian ultrasound hip screening program, in which all Austrian babies undergo hip sonography twice: at the birth clinic during the 1st week of life and at an age of 12-16 weeks.
Data from all public health insurance companies since 1985 and all ICD data about children hospitalized because of CDH in Austria were collected and analyzed.
The rate of sonographically pathological hips was 6.57 % (1994).
The treatment rate before introduction of hip sonography was 13.16 % (1985).
The rate of open reduction went down to 0.24 per 1000 newborns, including a high number of unscreened children born abroad and also children with teratological dislocation of the hip.
Hip sonography screening proved to be effective in detecting true instability of the hip joint as well as dysplasia.
The optimal time for sonographic screening does not seem to be immediately after birth when only "high risk" hips (clinical instability, positive family history, breech delivery) should undergo hip sonography, but at an age between 4 and 6 weeks when the hip has already shown its true nature.
Since one sonographic scan appears to be sufficient for screening, a further reduction of costs could be accomplished.
Disability owing to DDH can be avoided in a number of cases, and costs for conservative and surgical treatment as well as for later endoprostheses and early retirement can be economized.
Transactional analysis (Berne 1958) in its original concepts was intended to help even lay people to understand personal structures and psychodynamic processes.
This intention lead some of the following authors to superficiality and a "happy-go-lucky" perspective.
Others, most of all European transactional analysts went back to the roots of the original contents and aims and showed that they offer great clinical relevance for the understanding and treatment of a variety of disturbances.
This article will illustrate these aspects, using the borderline syndrome as an example.
The structural model of egostates serves to describe the borderline structure, concepts of the frame of reference and the script as patterns for the development and maintenance of the pathology, the concepts of transactions, games, symbioses and passivity as indicators for the stable instability of the relationships, and devaluations and grandiosities as examples of defence patterns.
Practical ideas about the therapeutic contract as a basis of various working agreements, about methods of decreasing anxiety in therapeutic processes, and about contact and attachment as a substrate for corrective experiences, a healing atmosphere and dedramatisation of the process follow.
The article ends with transactional analytic considerations of transference, counter-transference and how to deal with regression processes.
After separation of symblepharons in ocular pemphigoid, transplantation of nasal or bucal mucosa is recommended to prevent recurrent lid fusion; however, it is not always successful.
The disturbance of generalized cheerfulness (serene-calmness disorder) is an illness, which is often recognised very late.
It is characterised by a uniformity of psychic experience in the face of circumstances which would otherwise give cause for depressiveness, despair, great anxiety, self-accusations or aggression directed against others.
Early diagnosis and specific therapy may decisively improve life-quality of the patients and may also prevent detrimental individual and social long-term consequences.
Disturbances of microcirculation in coronary artery disease can be seen in the presence of critical stenosis of epicardial coronary arteries, as a result of endothelial dysfunction in the absence of significant stenosis or during recovery of ischaemic myocardium after successful angioplasty of stenosed or occluded coronary arteries.
Diagnostic methods are morphologic/morphometric analyses, measurement of the global coronary reserve, measurement of the regional coronary microcirculation (scintigraphy, positron emission tomography) and laboratory analysis of haemorheological alterations (plasma, erythrocytes, leucocytes).
After successful angioplasty, normalisation of glutamate extraction rate takes three to six months.
In patients with unstable angina, changes in plasma viscosity, erythrocyte aggregation and neutrophil activation occur.
Neutrophils are activated after successful angioplasty in acute myocardial infarction and even after elective angioplasty (when measured in the coronary sinus).
Therapeutic improvements of disturbed microvascular flow can be obtained by increasing perfusion pressure (by revascularisation, nitrates, calcium antagnoists, physical training), by improving the fluidity of the blood and by reducing the extravascular component of coronary vascular resistance (by antihypertensive treatment).
Intracytoplasmic injection of sperm (ICSI) extracted from testicular tissue (TESE) represents the only possibility for men with non-obstructive azoospermia to father a child.
ICSI is also the only treatment for men with obstructive azoospermia if microsurgery is not possible or not successful.
However, approximately only every fifth treatment cycle leads to a pregnancy.
Thus, in most cases, several treatment cycles have to be performed to achieve a pregnancy and therefore testicular biopsies have to be taken several times.
Cryopreservation of testicular tissue offers the possibility to store testicular tissue for several treatment cycles of in vitro fertilization (IVF) and to detach surgical sperm retrieval in the man and infertility treatment in the woman (ovarian stimulation, ovum pick-up, embryo transfer).
For the man, cryopreservation offers the advantage that only one testicular biopsy has to be performed for diagnostic reasons and for sperm retrieval.
The advantage for the women is that infertility treatment is started only if testicular histology confirms spermatids, at least in the testicular tissue.
The cumulative pregnancy rate of IVF/ICSI/TESE-cycles can be increased by cryopreservation of supernumerary pronuclear stage oocytes and embryo transfer after thawing in successive cycles.
This study gives a survey of the publications of articles about the care of the newborn around 1900.
A main paediatric and obstetric journal (Archiv für Kinderheilkunde, Archiv für Gynäkologie) from the turn of the century were analysed including the years 1885-1910.
Purpose: To compare electron beam CT (EBCT) und prospectively ECG gated conventional CT for the detection and quantification of coronary artery calcifications.
In Europe, saprophytic pulmonary aspergillosis represents the only mycotic infection relevant for thoracic surgery.
From the pathogenetic point of view, it is a colonization of preexisting lung or pleural cavities following other severe pulmonary diseases.
The incidence amounts to 0.4% among patients in a special hospital for pulmonary diseases.
Concerning this review, the diagnosis is based on histologic examination for all 66 patients we operated on between 1961 and 1996.
Preoperative proof of the fungal infection remains difficult.
The majority of patients (77%) are male.
There is a correlation between cigarette smoking and abuse of alcohol on the one hand and the incidence of the disease on the other hand.
A higher incidence of saprophytic pulmonary aspergillosis was found for people working in agriculture, in the building trade, and in paper mills.
Pulmonary tuberculosis and pneumonia were present in the past history in 47% of the patients.
Usually, the tentative diagnosis is based on chest x-ray, especially if hemoptysis is present.
Major hemoptysis is the most severe and most dangerous complication caused by aspergilloma.
Clinical presentation and chest x-ray findings are non-characteristic.
Nowadays, the typical x-ray of pulmonary aspergilloma, almost always localized in the upper lobes, became a rare finding.
If an aspergillus infection is suspected, serologic methods are reliable and sensitive.
A surgical procedure is absolutely indicated in patients with major hemoptysis in their history, in case of disease progression or indeterminate mass and in order to avoid fungal dissemination.
If a saprophytic aspergillosis is suspected according to radiologic findings, clinical examination, and patient's social history, an operation is justified.
Relative surgical indications are hepatotoxic and carcinogenic effects of the mycotoxins.
The lobectomy, if necessary carried out as pleuro-lobectomy, is the adequate resection in most patients (68%).
However, this operation is technically demanding and it usually requires a longer operating time as compared to lobectomies for other underlying diseases.
Peri- and postoperative complications occur in 60% of resections for pulmonary aspergilloma.
A higher incidence of postoperative complications was found for smaller resections, like segmentectomies or wedge resections, as compared to lobectomies.
Persistent pleural space problems connected with a prolonged stay in the hospital remains the main problem.
It requires a primary or secondary thoracoplasty in a number of patients.
The operative mortality rate is 3%.
A systemic antifungal therapy is not an appropriate treatment for saprophytic pulmonary aspergillosis and can even cause specific complications.
Introduction: Postoperative delirium is a common psychic disturbance occurring acutely after various surgical procedures and typically presenting with a fluctuating course.
These patients' recovery takes longer.
In this study we analyze the incidence of postoperative delirium in patients undergoing vascular surgery and try to identify risk factors for its development.
Methods: Patients undergoing elective arterial operations were included.
Their medical history, the specific vascular diagnosis and operation performed, the medication and laboratory data were monitored.
Additionally the patients were preoperatively interviewed by a psychiatrist.
Intraoperatively the drugs, infusions, possible transfusions, blood gases and pressures were monitored, as were the times of surgery and anesthesia.
Postoperatively patients were seen daily by the psychiatrist and the surgeon for at least 7 days.
Postoperative delirium was diagnosed according to DSM IV criteria, and mild, moderate and severe delirium were distinguished.
Results: Fifty-four patients entered the study.
Twenty-one (38.9 %) developed postoperative delirium (11 mild, 2 moderate, 8 severe).
Patients with aortic operations developed delirium more frequently than those with non-aortic procedures(55.5 vs 22.2 %, n = 27 each).
Some preexisting diseases (hearing disturbance) increased the probability of postoperative delirium, while age was not identified as a risk factor.
General psychopathological and depressive disturbances increased the likelihood of postoperative delirium.
Patients who had a severe intraoperative course developed postoperative delirium more frequently.
This was not seen in the absolute time of surgery or anesthesia nor in the intraoperative development of blood pressure or intraarterial gases, which did not differ between patients with and without postoperative delirium.
More reliable parameters were an increased intraoperative need for crystalloid volume, intra - or postoperatively decreased hemoglobin values (Hb < 10 g/dl) and the development of acidosis that had to be treated.
Patients with delirium had serious complications more often (8/21 = 38.1 % vs 6/33 = 18.2 %) and needed Intensive Care treatment longer (2.7 vs 2.1 days, only aortic surgery 3.2 vs 2.4 days).
Conclusions: Postoperative delirium after vascular surgery is frequent.
Patients undergoing aortic surgery, with specific concomittant medical disease, psychopathological disturbances and a severe intraoperative course, are at risk of developing postoperative delirium.
This report summarizes our experiences with the subjective visual vertical (SVV) as a clinical neuro-otological tool.
In the SVV test, patients have to orient a dim light bar in an otherwise dark surrounding earth-vertical, using a remote-control.
Normal subjects in an upright position did not deviate more than 2 ° from true vertical.
After vestibular neurectomy, the SVV was consistently tilted by some 12 ° toward the affected ear.
Smaller tilts (~7 °) of the SVV occured in patients with spontaneous peripheral vestibular diseases.
This shift in SVV disappeared within weeks to months, similar to the spontaneous nystagmus.
After stapes surgery slight deviations of the SVV towards the unoperated ear were seen in about 20% of the patients, indicating a slight irritation of the otolith organs.
Assessed in an upright position, the SVV thus may be regarded as reflecting tonic otolithic input differences between the two ears.
Introduction: Vocal cord paralysis is a important complication in thyroid gland surgery.
A prospective study was conducted ascertain the frequency of laryngeal nerve palsy not caused by surgical trauma.
Patients and Methods: Two hundred and ten patients were investigated laryngoscopically pre- and postoperatively after short-term intubation in the course of operations far removed from thorax or neck region.
We noted the inner diameter of the tube, intubation problems, the qualification of the anaesthesiologist and the positioning of the patient.
Results: Preoperatively we found previously unknown unilateral laryngeal nerve palsy in 1.9 % of cases.
Postoperatively there were pathological findings of vocal cords in 13 patients (6.2 %).
In 10 patients a direct lesion (oedema, rubor, haematoma, granuloma) was established.
Three patients (1.4 %) were found to have a movement disorder caused by a neural lesion without morphological findings, leading to restitutio ad integrum in two of three cases after 6 months.
Conclusion: The frequency of intubation-related recurrent nerve palsy is 1.4 % transiently and 0.5 % permanently.
Preoperative laryngoscopic investigation of vocal cords should be carried out before intubation.
Herpes simplex virus type 1 (HSV-1) and type 2 (HSV-2) are the most frequent infections cause of genital ulcerations.
Although genital infections by HSV-1 are increasing HSV-2 is dominant in recurrent infections.
This study was conducted on a panel of sera collected anonymously in 1996 and 1997 from blood donors (1979 samples) and hospital patients (3079 samples) without risk factors for herpesvirus infections such as STD, other infectious diseases and immunosuppression.
Serum samples were tested with ELISAs using monoclonal antibody-selected native gG1 and gG2 as antigens and an immunoblot using type-specific recombinant glycoproteins.
Equivocal results were confirmed with an in-house Western blot.
This study investigates the effects of acamprosate, a glutamatergic modulator, and the lipid peroxidation inhibitor U-101033E on neurological outcome following incomplete cerebral ischemia and reperfusion in rats.
We report on three family members suffering from both autosomal dominant Hailey-Hailey disease and bipolar affective disorder.
As molecular biology techniques have made the localization of genes causing simple Mendelian traits possible as a routine task, the gene for Hailey-Hailey disease will presumably be localized in the foreseeable future.
The Hailey-Hailey gene and its chromosomal surrounding will then be a region of interest for linkage studies in bipolar affective disorder.
Background: Osteoporotic fractures occur frequently also in men.
Epidemiologic data from Germany indicate that more than 900,000 men are affected by osteoporotic fractures.
Diagnosis and therapy of male osteoporosis are hampered by a lack of clinical studies.
Recurrent headaches and recurrent abdominal pain (RAP) are the most common pain syndromes in childhood: The prevalence of tension headache amounts to 20-50 %, of migraine to 5-7 % and of RAP to 15-30 %.
In nearly 50 % of children the complaints persist over many years of their life-span.
The unfavourable long-term prognosis support the indication of early and specific interventions.
Empirical findings on the etiology, pathogenesis, and pathophysiology are still very limited.
Actual approaches suggest to understand recurrent pain syndromes as a complex and multidimensional disturbance, and in this context there is strong evidence for the major importance of psychosocial influences.
The behavioral-medicine proceeding bases upon an extensive family anamnestic exploration and symptom analysis.
The psychological interventions applied in clinical practice include prophylaxis (stress inoculation, cognitive redefinition, problem solving), reduction of pain symptoms (relaxation, distraction, imagination) and environmental modification (parental reinforcement and modeling behavior).
During the last years there has been an increasing trend to create more complex and multidimensional behavioral pain management programs for children.
The aim of our study was to develop noninvasive stereotactic radiotherapy for patients with choroidal metastases.
Extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy (ESWL) is standard therapy for urolithiasis.
With comparable technical principles, various lithotripters have been developed and are in routine use.
Renal pelvic stones, calyceal stones, ureteral stones, and other special forms can be treated with varying results.
Currently, the so-called clinically insignificant residual fragments and the recurrence of calculi are under discussion.
Whereas the side effects of ESWL are well known, studies comparing ESWL with other endourological procedures are still lacking.
Suramin has long been used in the treatment of onchocerciasis and trypanosomiasis.
Recent investigations showed an antiproliferative effect of suramin on prostate carcinoma cell lines.
Ongoing clinical trials have confirmed the effect of suramin on metastasizing prostate carcinoma.
Five patients with metastatic prostate carcinoma resistant to classic hormonal therapy were treated with high-dose suramin.
Four of the five developed a papulovesicular or maculopapular rash within 2 - 4 weeks of starting therapy.
The rashes disappeared after discontinuation of suramin within 10 days.
In tumour therapy, high dosages of suramin are used to achieve a serum level of 200 - 300 µg/ml.
Therefore, a toxic reaction to suramin is suspected as the explanation for the skin rashes.
Acetylcholinesterase (ACE) inhibitor-induced angioedema is supposed to be an uncommon cause for oropharyngeal edema.
Between January 1, 1993 and February 1, 1997 we treated 20 patients with edema of the oropharyngeal region that was not caused by infection or irradiation.
The most common reason was an ACE-inhibitor-induced angioedema and occurred in 9 cases, all of whom required inpatient treatment.
The medical management consisted of the administra- tion of intravenous (i.v.)
glucocorticosteroids in all cases, H1-blockers in 6 cases, epinephrine by inhalation in one case and i.v.
Tracheostomy had to be performed in one patient.
In our experience it is necessary to reconsider ACE inhibitor-induced angioedma in any case of an oropharyngeal edema.
However, there is no reason for the routine application of epinephrine in these cases.
After treatment of more than 3000 kidney and ureteral stones with the Siemens Lithostar Multiline the results of the first 1400 ureteral stone treatments using the "Booster technique" and 3-month follow-up findings are reported.
There was a disintegration rate of 98 % directly after treatment; 1 week after "Booster technique" treatment 96 % of the patients were free of stones and without any symptoms.
The 3-month follow-up showed a stone-free rate of 97 %.
Only in 13 % of the cases auxiliary procedures were neccessary, 7 % of them before extracorporeal shock wave lithotripsy (ESWL) and 6 % after ESWL.
43 % of the treatments were performed without any premedication, anaesthesia or sedoanalgesia.
Our data even prove that in situ ESWL is a safe and effective method for the treatment of ureteral stones.
In comparison to endoscopic procedures, it is superior in regard to invasivity, side effects, complications and neccessity of analgesia, while being just as efficient.
Therefore it is recommended as first choice method in the treatment of ureteral stones.
The perspectives for active hearing implants lie in the treatment of patients with sensorineural hearing loss (SNHL).
The majority of patients with SNHL suffer from a cochlea amplifier (CA) failure which is discernible by a positive recruitment and loss of otoacoustic emissions (OAE).
Therefore, the electronic implant is expected to partially replace functions of the CA.
Thus, the implant is thought to function as a CAI (cochlea amplifier implant).
An approved implant for routine use is not yet available.
Clinical studies have thus far only used the high energy consuming (HEC), narrow-band, electromagnetic floating-mass transducer, as well as the Maniglia-HEC implant.
The high energie consuming, yet broadband Canadian Fredrickson implant is soon to be used in humans.
Of the piezoelectrical implants, a German CAI (Tübingen implant) at present consisting of a piezoelectrical transducer and a microphone has thus far been acutely implanted in first patient.
It is a low energy consuming (LEC), broad-band implantable system for patients with sensorineural hearing loss.
Juvenile myoclonic epilepsy (JME) was de-scribed electroclinically by Janz and Christian in 1957 and consists of myoclonic jerks in  varying combination with the absence of seizures and generalized tonic-clonic seizures, a typical circadian distribution on awakening, sleep deprivation, alcohol consumption and flickering stimuli as characteristic precipitating factors, typical EEG abnormalities with generalized epileptiform discharges, normal physical and neuroradiological findings, and often a family history of epilepsy.
Although the misdiagnosis of this well-classified and easily treatable syndrome is supposed to occur rarely in Germany, we retrospectively investigated how often the wrong initial classification had been made among patients who were finally treated in our outpatient epilepsy unit.
Between 1993 and 1995, 30 patients with a typical JME-like symptom constellation were identified who had been misdiagnosed initially.
In all patients, localization-related epilepsy had been classified, although regional EEG abnormalities were rare (n=5).
All patients reported the typical circadian distribution, abnormal neuroradiological findings were absent, and typical EEG abnormalities were present in all cases.
Under treatment with appropiate antiepileptic drugs 97% of the patients became almost completely seizure-free.
Even 40 years after the first description of the syndrome, JME is an underdiagnosed illness.
The generally  positive course underlines the importance of its correct identification.
Background: The aim of the study was to evaluate results of visual acuity and binocularity and complications after cataract surgery with primary capsular bag-fixated IOL implantation in children.
Arterial hypertension is known to be an important risk factor for cerebral and cardiovascular disease.
Previous studies have demonstrated alterations in the perifoveal microcirculation in patients with essential hypertension.
During follow-up a progression of these alterations has been reported.
In the present study we quantified the retinal microcirculation of patients with hypertension under different systemic antihypertensive medication.
Vaginal and uterine bleeding is a common symptom in gynecology.
The cause of the bleeding should be investigated so as to exclude carcinoma as its origin.
First, the basic circulation parameters should be determined.
Blood volume and oxygen substitution are essential.
Depending on these findings, further diagnostic or therapeutic steps must be undertaken.
If the situation is stable, diagnostic measures are indicated to localize the bleeding and the tumor.
A general examination, including a vaginal and rectal examination, must be performed.
Other diagnostic procedures such as ultrasound (vaginal and transabdominal) and CT or MRI may be required.
If available, an angiography should be performed.
Medium-term results with a follow-up of at least 3 years were done in 160 patients (average follow up 51 months) after ACL reconstruction using IKDC evaluation form and Noyes score and in 110 patients (average follow Up 53 months) after non-operative management.
Unlike objective good parameters the subjective assessment of knee function according to the Noyes score reveals significantly worse results in cases with ACL reconstruction compared to the knees without surgery.
The best functional results we found in professional athletes after ACL reconstruction.
Comparable positive results of knee function is only achieved in approx.
15 % of the patients from the natural history group, who can maintain high risk pivoting activity level feeling no giving way.
In our opinion compensatory proprioceptive mechanism account for the surpassing results in these two groups of patients.
It will be postulated that it is not the absolute power of the hamstring but the latency period of recruition that influences the compensation of anterior knee instability.
We have modified our rehabilitation methods in order to improve proprioception and dynamic stability of the ACL-deficient knee.
Based on our results we primarily limitate the ACL reconstruction on a group of patients practicing high-risk-pivoting sports.
Only when menisceal lesions appear or patients suffer from giving way episodes we support secondary surgery.
The pivot shift sign is reflecting the dynamic aspect of knee instability.
In our opinion it is the decisive parameter to assess knee instability unless there are useful technical procederes.
Multiple injuries in elderly patients are still a common problem.
The present study was performed to investigate mortality and complications in multiple trauma patients aged 65 years or more.
A total of 1154 multiple trauma patients with an injury severity score (ISS) of at least 18 points were divided in two age groups: Y: 16 - 64 years, n = 1022; O: 65 - 94 years, n = 132.
Older patients were injured as pedestrians in most cases (69%), while younger patients were more frequently injured as car and drivers passengers (41%).
ISS was comparable in both groups (Y 28 +/- 1, O 27 +/- 1).
During ICU-therapy incidence of ARDS (Y 10%, O 11%), multiple organ dysfunction syndrome (MOF; Y 6%, O 9%) and pneumonia (Y 17%, O 21%) were comparable.
In contrast, septic complications were more frequent in older patients (Y 19%, O 27%).
Length of ICU stay (Y 19 +/- 2, O 18 +/- 1) and ventilation time (Y 14 +/- 2, O 17 +/- 1) were comparable.
Mortality was significantly higher in older patients (Y 15%, O 53%).
The major cause of death was sepsis in older patients (Y 15%, O 31%) and MOF in younger patients (Y 54%, O 29%).
In conclusion, older trauma patients had a higher mortality due to the development of septical complications.
The Raynaud phenomenon occurs in 90-100% of patients with systemic scleroderma.
It is caused by dysregulation of the vascular tone between vasocontrictive and vasodilatory influences.
Early damage to the vascular endothelium and the activation of platelets lead to the release of vasoactive substances.
Structural and function impairment of the perivascular neural fibers contributes to the vasospasm.
New vasodilatory treatment strategies, e.g.
infusions with calcitonin gene-related peptides, could be useful in the control of vasospasm in the peripheral extremities as well as internal organs in systemic scleroderma.
Due to the limited efficacy of drug therapy in atrial fibrillation and the high rate of recurrence, strong efforts were made to find non-pharmacological strategies.
For three years now, the implantable atrial defibrillator Metrix from InControl has been available as an alternative therapy.
From October 1995 to the present the atrial defibrillator was implanted in 179 patients worldwide.
The sensitivity of the system and its algorithms to detect atrial fibrillation is 90%; the specifity to detect sinus rhythm is 100%.
In 121 of 179 patients, 748 episodes of spontaneous atrial fibrillation were treated with 2.4 shocks per episode.
No proarrhythmic event or stroke was seen.
A cardioversion to sinus rhythm could be achieved in 95% of patients; the overall clinical success rate was 88%.
In 7% of all patients, early recurrence of atrial fibrillation (ERAF) occurred that could not be converted into stable sinus rhythm after further cardioversions and antiarrhythmic therapy.
In 4.1% there were lead-related complications, in 4 patients the device had to be explanted because of ineffective therapy, and in 3 patients the device had to be changed because of loss of telemetry or early depletion of battery.
In 8 patients, postoperative complications were seen (infections, pneumothorax and thrombosis of the subclavian vein).
Overall, the implantable atrial defibrillator Metrix is an effective and safe alternative in treating atrial fibrillation.
Background: The success rate of combined glaucoma and small incision cataract surgery is not yet established.
The somatosensory system of preterms and newborns differs substantially from adults.
These differences are of considerable preclinical and clinical interest.
Maturation of A- and C-fibre synaptic connections in the dorsal horn and development of descending inhibition from the brainstem all take place postnatally in the rat.
In early stages of development there is no definite spatial sepraration in the dorsal horn between the nociceptive and the non-nociceptive system.
In preterms but not in adults non-noxious stimuli can induce central sensitization.
Many neurotransmitters and signalling molecules involved in pain pathways are expressed early in the developing nervous system but do not reach adult levels for a considerable period.
More important, receptors are frequently transiently overexpressed or expressed in areas during development where they are not seen in the adult and may have a different functional profile.
The descending pain inhibitory system that provides an important protection against central sensitization developes later than the ascending nociceptive system.
Thus, during a critical period of time the immature nociceptive system is highly vulnerable.
For example, neonatal circumcision in the absence of analgesia results in increased pain responses during subsequent routine vaccination months later.
Numerous studies conducted during the past decades indicate that the public's attitude toward the mentally ill is strongly prejudiced.
Since the attitude of the general public also has an effect on community-based psychiatric care, we must ask how public opinion might be influenced.
One possible approach could be through so-called key community leaders - those who are highly respected in society because of their competence in a particular area.
Doctors belong to this group of people.
For this reason we questioned medical students, as future key community leaders, with respect to their attitudes toward the mentally ill within the framework of their first contact with psychiatric patients during their studies.
In order to make a direct comparison possible, we interviewed a sample of the Mannheim population who live in a part of the city where a variety of complementary facilities have been set up.
The comparison shows that medical students do not have a more positive attitude toward the mentally ill; in fact, in certain areas they have an even more negative attitude toward the mentally ill than the general population has.
We were not able to establish what effect teaching has with respect to changing attitudes.
Systematic lymphadenectomy for colorectal cancer aims to remove potentially metastatic lymph nodes from the tumor's drainage basin.
This requires knowledge of normal lymphatic anatomy and metastatic routes.
Systematic lymphadenectomy performed as a standard or as an extended resection is a prerequisite for pathologic tumor staging.
An intensive search by the pathologist for lymph node metastases is critical for precise staging.
Recommendations as to the extent of lymphadenectomy are derived from potential improvement of prognosis and procedure-related complications.
Life threatening hemorrhage in patients with malignant tumours of the head and neck area are often, as a result of tumour infiltration, postoperative anatomical changes, infection and radiological necrosis, difficult to control.
One option for prophylaxis and treatment is the ligature of the external (ECA) or common carotid artery (CCA) and superior thyroid artery (STA).
52 patients were examined in a retrospective study to determine both the hazards and the therapeutic use of the procedure.
The external carotid artery (ECA) was ligated prophylactically during the operative procedure of tumour resection and neck dissection in 25 patients.
In 27 cases closure of the ECA, CCA or ECA and STA was carried out as an emergency procedure for acute hemorrhage following completed primary treatment (operation, primary or postoperative radiation or radiochemotherapy).
There was no postoperative hemorrhage after prophylactic ligature of the ECA.
One patient with multiple cardiovascular diseases suffered from an ipsilateral cerebral infarction 1 year after operation.
In 6 of 9 patients and in all 3 patients, in whom ligature of the CCA or ECA and STA respectively was carried out as an emergency procedure, severe neurological complications up to an apallic syndrome occured.
The number of deaths due to acute hemorrhage was considerably smaller among those patients with prophylactic ligature of the ECA performed during operative procedure of tumor resection and neck dissection.
In addition there were much less unfavourable courses in the sequence of prophylactic closure of the ECA than observed after ligating the CCA or ECA and STA in an emergency situation.
The carcinoid tumor of the middle ear is a very rare neoplasm which in general is regarded as benign but may be mistaken for an adenocarcinoma because of its histological heterogeneity.
Typical, however, is its neuroendocrine and mucinous differentiation so that an unequivocal diagnosis is possible by means of immunohistochemistry and electron microscopy.
As the tumor is very rare, there is no statistical evidence as to whether further treatment is necessary after primary exstirpation of the tumor.
Therefore, a review of the literature was performed.
We report about a 28-year-old male patient with a carcinoid tumor of the left tympanic cavity.
Without any further treatment there has been no evidence for either recurrence or metastases 32 months after surgical resection.
As treatment of choice we recommend conservative surgery with complete removal of the tumor and a clinical follow-up on a regular basis.
Intraoperative precision in computer-assisted surgery depends on the characteristics of a navigation system, the precision of correlation between object and data set, the position, number and fixation of landmarks, and the parameters of the data set.
The characteristics of a navigation system, in particular the immanent precision, can be detected by the use of the geometric model and navigation analyzer developed at the University of Regensburg with the support of Carl Zeiss, Germany.
The precision of five navigation systems of different types and technology was measured: Viewing Wand (ISG, mechanical system), the SMN microscope (Carl Zeiss, infrared system with laser autofocus), the MKM system (Carl Zeiss, robot platform with laser autofocus) and the STP pointer (Leibinger, infrared system).
The immanent precision of these systems ranges from 0.1 to 2.0 mm.
An electromagnetic system (3-Space Digitizer, Polhemus) was compared; this produces serious spherical deviations of 10.0 to 20.0 mm in the presence of metal, surgical and rotating instruments, and circuits.
The application of these different systems for craniomaxillofacial surgery is discussed.
The aim of the study was to record retrospectively the events of Pneumocystis carinii-Pneumonia (PCP) among HIV-infected children (<18 years) in Germany.
The patients were evaluated with regard to prophylaxis, course of disease and prognosis.
In this study we looked at the relationship between extracorporal circulation and changes in blood electrolytes.
Glucocorticoids are a potent cause of osteoporosis and thus a potential source of substantial morbidity in patients who are already significantly disabled by their underlying condition.
These agent interact with calcium metabolism at many levels; in particular they reduce the osteoblast's synthesis of the principal proteins of bone matrix.
They also reduce circulating sex hormone concentrations, particularly in men and postmenopausal women.
Gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST), which form a rare group of neoplasias of the gastrointestinal tract, have not yet been fully investigated.
Although good progress has been made in their diagnosis, classification of these lesions with regard to their histogenesis and biological behavior remains problematic.
Between 1994 and 1998, 18 GIST patients underwere operation in the Department of Surgery.
Twelve of these patients (67 %) had stromal tumors in the stomach, and six (33 %) had intestinal stromal tumors.
The primary tumor could be removed in all patients with R0 resection.
Six patients developed hematogenous liver metastasis, with the size of their primary tumor exceeding 10 cm.
Extrahepatic distant metastases were not found in any case.
Lymphadenectomy showed that lymph node metastases did not occur.
Histological evaluation was made according to the guidelines of Lewin, Weinstein and Riddell.
Currently established therapy is limited to complete surgical resection of the primary tumor and its metastases.
Adjuvant or neoadjuvant chemotherapy approaches have failed.
Acute leptospirosis in Europe (Weil's disease) is a rare and in more than 90 % of the cases undiagnosed febrile, self-limited disease.
We report the case of a 39-year-old sewerage worker, who was admitted to our hospital with fever, jaundice, pain in his calves and acute renal failure.
Serology revealed elevated antibody titers against Leptospira canicola, L. icterhaemorrhagica and L. sejroe.
The patient developed disseminated intravascular coagulation (DIC) with diffuse gastrointestinal bleeding due to thrombocytopenia.
The ECG showed atrial fibrillation with irregularly irregular rhythm.
Cardiac arrest developed, most likely due to hypoxia, with a drop in the blood pressure.
Despite immediate resuscitation efforts the patient developed severe hypoxic brain damage and died a few days later.
Autopsy disclosed histologic signs of a generalized leptospiral infection, signs of shock and within the lungs a necrotizing herpes simplex virus pneumonia causing the death of the patient.
The virus pneumonia most probably was caused by retrograde canalicular dissemination of oral secretions since herpetic tracheitis and esophagitis were found and herpetic lesions were readily identified on the lips and tongue.
A medical opinion asked for by the professional association having liability for occupational safety and insurance was given, the disease being recognized as an occupational disease.
During the past decade, the molecular mechanisms in the process of tumor progression, including metastasis and angiogenesis, have become better understood.
Cancer metastasis consists of multiple, complex interacting steps.
Each of these steps is crucial and limiting, since a failure to complete any one prevents the tumor cell from producing a metastasis.
Detachment from the solid tumor by loosening the intercellular junctions and proteolysis of the extracellular matrix enables tumor cells to enter blood- and lymph vessels.
The intravasation into the circulation is supported by the secretion of angiogenic factors, which induce degradation of the basal membran in blood vessels.
Adhesion to endothelial cells, extravasation from the circulation, and induction of angiogenesis are further essential steps for completing the metastatic process.
Furthermore, it is well known that once a tumor cell has entered circulation, it will survive only by evasion of the immune system.
The systematic identification of tumor antigens opens up new possibilities for immunotherapeutic approaches.
Hypogonadism is the main indication for testosterone substitution in the ageing male.
The choice of the testosterone preparation should be based on the principle that serum levels of testosterone remain in the normal range and fast termination of therapy is possible.
To date, transdermal testosterone systems appear to be best suited for substitution therapy in the ageing male.
Future promising developments are testosterone gels and intramuscular testosterone undecanoate.
Any testosterone therapy in the ageing male has to be monitored closely, especially regarding erythropoiesis and the prostate.
Pigmented villonodular synovitis (PVNS) is a disease that involves the lining of joints, bursae and tendon sheaths.
The incidence is low and estimated to be 1.8 patients per million population.
The cause of PVNS is unclear and discussed to be either inflammatory or neoplastic.
PVNS has been described in 2 forms different for prognosis and treatment (nodular and diffuse).
The articular form almost appeares in the knee joint as we describe below in a 14 year-old patient.
In this retrospective study, 13 patients with subtle Lisfranc joint injuries were examined after a mean period of 23 months using clinical assessment, radiography and dynamic pedographic gait analysis.
The aims were to identify the factors leading to a mobile flatfoot deformity, evaluate the functional and clinical outcome of these injuries, and draw practical conclusions for initial management and subsequent intervention.
All patients showed a mobile flatfoot deformity, increased motion in the subtalar joint, increased load on the hindfoot, decreased load on the forefoot, and a prolonged contact phase during the stance phase.
Radiographs revealed progressive osteoarthrosis in the joint and a residual displacement of the medial Lisfranc joint.
An unstable medial Lisfranc joint results in the development of a mobile flatfoot.
Initial treatment of a subtly displaced Lisfranc joint should consist of exact anatomical reduction and additional maintenance of the longitudinal arch of the foot.
After failed initial treatment, early arthrodesis of the midfoot is recommended as a salvage procedure for the foot.
Cross-sectional imaging with CT and MRI plays an indispensable complementary role to endoscopy in the pretherapeutic workup and staging of laryngeal neoplasms.
Adequate interpretation of the CT and MR images requires a thorough knowledge of the patterns of submucosal spread and familiarity with the diagnostic signs of neoplastic invasion as seen with each modality.
In addition, the radiologist should be aware of the implications of imaging for staging and treatment.
Both CT and MR imaging are highly sensitive for the detection of neoplastic invasion of the pre-epiglottic space, paraglottic space, subglottic region and cartilage.
The high negative predictive value of both CT and MRI allows exclusion of neoplastic cartilage invasion quite reliably.
The specificity of both CT and MRI is, however, limited and both methods may therefore overestimate the extent of tumor spread.
Nevertheless, both cross-sectional imaging methods significantly improve the pretherapeutic staging accuracy of laryngeal tumors if used in addition to clinical examination and endoscopic biopsy.
In the presence of a submucosal mass, CT and MRI play a key role for the diagnosis, as they may characterize the lesion, reliably depict its submucosal extent, and guide the endoscopist to perform deep biopsies that allow a definitive histological diagnosis.
Background: HLA-DR antigen plays a key role in transplantation immunology.
Organ culture storage leads to loss of HLA-DR-positive corneal Langerhans cells.
This study investigates the importance of prolonged storage period for the success rate after penetrating keratoplasty.
Ergotamine-containing drugs are widely used in the treatment of acute migraine attacks.
Among others, spastic vasoconstrictions are one of the possible side effects usually affecting the lower extremities and sometimes leading to gangrene.
The case of a 75 year old woman is presented who was suffering from migraine-attacks since adolescence.
Due to longterm use of ergotamine containing suppositories she developed perianal ulcers.
After withdrawl of the drug the ulcers healed up entirely.
The spectrum of ergotamine-induced side-effects and possible intervention strategies are discussed.
In this article, a model of quality assurance for inpatient psychotherapy is discussed, which was developed in cooperation between researchers and clinicians.
This model is based on the concept of internal quality assurance with external help.
The Heidelberg Model of Active Internal Quality Assurance has three elements: (1.)
a QA-Inventory for routine monitoring; (2.)
rules for evaluating the outcome of every patient and (3.)
a feedback model for communicating the results to the therapists (quality circles).
The focus of this model is the recognition of problematic results.
It is mainly these results that will be discussed in our quality circles, where the outcome of treatments from the perspective of the inventory and of the therapists are discussed.
This feedback model and the quality circles will be explained with three examples of patients.
The Heidelberg Model of Active Internal Quality Assurance will be seen as the basis of a concept of Quality Assurance, which is aimed at assuring and improving the quality and rationality of the psychotherapeutic service.
Aims: In this study the technique of intravenous regional anesthesia (Bier block) was evaluated as an experimental tool to differentiate peripheral and central effects of analgesics.
A pre-term infant weighing 900 g, gestational age 25 weeks, developed an acute abdomen.
Intravenous lines had been inserted previously in the left (silasticcatheter) and right (24 G cannula) saphenous veins in the neonatal intensive care unit.
During surgical exploration, a perforation of the terminal ileum was found.
The operation consisted in partial resection of the perforated ileum with an end-to-end anastomosis and a double-lumen colostomy.
Major blood loss during the procedure caused serious haemodynamic problems.
Despite transfusion of erythrocyte (100 ml), thrombocytes (75 ml), and albumin (50 ml), the patient developed bradycardia and hypotension.
Administration of atropine, adrenaline, and calcium IV had no effect.
The operation could be finished only with extrathoracic resuscitation.
When the drapes were removed, livid, swollen lower limbs raised the suspicion of an acute thrombosis of the inferior vena cava.
After insertion of a 24 G IV cannula into a vein of the right upper arm, the circulation stabilised after rapid transfusion of 40 ml blood and 25 ml thrombocytes and resuscitation was successful.
Paediatricians and anaesthesiologists must consider the risk of thrombosis of the vena cava.
If venous lines in the lower limbs are not visible to the anaesthesiologist during the operation, venipuncture of veins of an upper limb is recommended before starting the surgical procedure.
Due to the high incidence of vena cava thrombosis caused by central venous lines and the difficulty of peripheral venipuncture in pre-termintanty, a safe venous line should be inserted if necessary by pre-operative venesection.
While complementary medicine and homeopathy is becoming an increasingly prominent part of the health care practices, there is a lack of controlled studies concerning their effectiveness.
In our study, we wanted to answer the question whether a combination of Formica rufa D6 and reinjection of the patient's own blood is superior to injection of placebo.
104 patients with ankylosing spondylitis entered a prospective, randomized, double-blind study.
During four weeks they received twice weekly either 1 ml of Formica rufa D6 in combination with 0.5 ml of blood or 1.5 ml NaCl intramuscular.
Before and after therapy, mobility, thoracic excursion and doctor's overall assessment were measured in addition to patient's health status, using a German version of the Arthritis Impact Measurement Scales, before and after therapy as well as four, twelve, and twentyfour weeks later.
We were not able to detect any statistical difference between treatment and placebo group in any of the parameters measured.
Therefore, the therapy under study may not be regarded effective.
A 32-year-old man was accused of attempted rape.
While urinating at the side of the road he felt an erection.
He approached a 9-year-old girl who happened to be coming along and pressed his penis between her legs until ejaculation.
Shortly afterwards he was arrested.
He confessed, but claimed partial amnesia and had no explanation for the offence, which he normally would never have thought of.
Shortly before the event a witness had seen him nearby in a poor state of orientation.
Three months later in prison he suffered massive subarachnoidal hemorrhage from an aneurysm of the anterior communicating artery.
The evaluation of his legal responsibility must take account of a putative psychomotor seizure at the time of the offence.
With regard to the aneurysm diagnosed later, a pathogenetic connection, in terms of a preceding warning leak, might be assumed.
We present a 43-year-old patient who has had up to 15 frontal lobe seizures nightly for 12 years.
The patient had no complaints apart from excessive daytime sleepiness.
Neurological and psychiatric examination as well as cerebral computed tomograph and magnetic resonance imaging were normal.
After sleep deprivation an interictal electro-encephalogram demonstrated a recurrent excess of theta activity over the right frontal and frontopolar area.
A cerebral PET study showed diminished glucose metabolism of the right cingular and frontomesial region.
The sleep structure was extremely fragmented.
There was an excessive reduction of slow-wave sleep and REM sleep.
Carbamazepine therapy produced complete seizure control lasting a few weeks, followed by return of up to 8 seizures per night.
Vigabatrin as add on therapy diminished the noctural seizures to 1 to 3 per night.
Introduction: We attempted to optimize the determination of energy expenditure and substrate utilisation in VLBW infants for practical use in a tertiary care center.
The influence of measuring conditions upon results as well as of caloric intake and food composition on substrate utilisation and growth were investigated.
We report a truck driver with severe soft tissue contusion of both legs who developed atypical heparin-induced thrombocytopenia (HIT) after a thrombosis prophylaxis with unfractionated heparin; despite a thrombosis the patient showed a systemic allergic reaction to heparin in combination with elevation of thrombocytes and positive heparin-dependent antibodies.
Six days after the initial trauma deep vein thrombosis of the left lower leg was diagnosed and fasciotomy was performed, preventing an imminent compartment syndrome.
Another 5 days later the patient developed exanthema of the trunk and upper extremities and urticaria on his face, as well as severe headache.
His platelet count increased from 134 000/µl to 258 000/µl.
After exclusion of other causes for these symptoms, a reaction to heparin-dependent antibodies (heparin-platelet-factor 4 complex) was demonstrated 2 days later.
Thrombosis prophylaxis was changed to hirudin (Refludan) and elevation of thrombocytes to 445 000/µl was noted.
Shortly after rinsing of an intravenous line with less than 50 IE unfractionated heparin at day 36 after trauma the patient developed an anaphylactic shock, which could be managed with cortisone.
We suggest that in HIT the thrombocytopenia may represent only one form of an allergic reaction to heparin.
The cause of the thrombembolic event is an antigen-antibody reaction to heparin taking place on the surface of the thrombocyte.
This is similar in all forms of systemic reaction to heparin application, even though the symptoms may vary.
As thrombocytopenia may not be the main symptom of a heparin-induced antibody reaction - in our hospital only 5 of 10 patients with HIT - the disease should rather be named "heparin allergy".
We suggest a new classification of different pattern of heparin allergy types I-IV.
The new types I and II are similar to HIT types I and II.
Type III is the reaction of antibodies without decrease of thrombocytes, and type IV the reaction of antibodies associated with systemic allergic symptoms.
In recent years, lengthening the human mandible by distraction osteogenesis has become an accepted treatment to correct severe mandibular hypoplasia.
Using intraoral unidirectional and extraoral bidirectional distraction devices we report about our experiences and results in the application of the bone distraction technique in four selected cases of syndromal disease, including various forms of mandibular hypoplastic malformations.
The patients involved were a boy with Pierre Robin syndrome, a girl with unilateral facial hypoplasia in Goldenhar's syndrome, a case with Nager's syndrome, and a rare case of midline deficiency caused by partial deletion of chromosome 18 (18p-syndrome).
The distraction period lasted from 6 to 30 days and new bone formation, ranging from 6 to 28 mm, was achieved.
Real leg length discrepancies may be cosmetically disturbing and lead to gait abnormalities, pelvic obliquity with subsequent lumbar scoliosis as well as functional disturbances of hip, knee and ankle joint.
Morbidity and mortality after reversal of Hartmann's procedure following perforated sigmoid diverticulitis are high and the rate of intestinal restoration is low.
Aim: To investigate whether laparoscopically assisted reversal of Hartmann's procedure is technically feasible and whether the laparoscopic procedure offers any benefit to the patient.
Method: Nineteen patients were investigated.
The postoperative course was followed prospectively.
All patients were reinvestigated 9 months after surgery.
Results: Laparoscopic reversal of Hartmann's procedure was attempted in 19 patients.
One patient did not want the laparoscopic technique.
In two cases (11 %) conversion to the conventional technique was necessary; thus, 16 patients were operated laparoscopically.
Median operative time was 114 (65-180) min.
With the exception of three wound infections no immediate postoperative complications were noticed.
Patients' convalescence was fast.
First evacuation took place 3.3 (3-5) days after surgery, complete oral nutrition 3.6 (3-5) days after surgery.
Duration of postoperative hospitalisation was 7.5 (5-12) days.
One patient developed later a clinically significant anastomotic stricture which needed endoscopic dilatation.
Conclusion: Laparoscopically assisted Hartmann's reversal is technically demanding but feasible.
Postoperative morbidity is low, duration of hospitalisation short, convalescence fast.
Thus, good arguments exist for performing reversal of Hartmann's procedures laparoscopically.
Mechanical ventilation is a well-etablished strategy in intensive care medicine.
ICU trauma patients require analgesia, and sedation mostly consists of benzodiazepines and opioids with increasing doses over time.
The weaning period is complicated by the withdrawal syndrome, showing tachycardia, hypertonia, tachypnea and restlessness.
Although treatment with clonidine can influence these symptoms, tachypnea still remains the main problem in weaning patients from mechanical ventilation.
Adding sufentanil, an opioid with greater effects on analgesia than on respiratory depression compared with fentanyl, tachypnea can be reduced to normal frequency.
In this way weaning management can be managed more easily for the benefit of both, the patient and physician.
In comparison with a group of 50 patients treated with clonidine alone, 72 patients treated with clonidine/sufentanil showed a shorter period from the start of spontaneous ventilation until extubation (4.8 vs 7.6 days) and until discharge from the ICU (7.7 vs 12.4 days).
The number of reintubations caused by respiratory exhaustion decreased from 16.0 to 2.8 %.
Background: With regard to penetrating keratoplasty methods to culture corneal donor tissues, microsurgical techniques, HLA typing and understanding of basic mechanisms in inflammation and especially graft rejection, and postoperative treatment schedules have been improved in recent years.
This now enables successful penetrating keratoplasty in many more patients than previously performed.
However, in rare cases relevant problems in wound closure may appear.
The occurrence of a new influenza virus subtype in 1997 in Hongkong caused only minor outbreaks due to the swift and determined actions of the institutions involved.
However, this incident again made it clear that an influenza pandemic is still a pending threat.
As a result the WHO presented a pandemic preparedness plan which is to facilitate the global measures taken to fight an imminent or ongoing pandemic.
Strong efforts of influenza surveillance and the coordination of worldwide measures are essential to this plan.
Furthermore the WHO suggested the developement and introduction of similar national preparedness plans.
Given the high mortality of severe sepsis and septic shock, immunomodulation has been considered as an attractive adjunct therapy.
Many agents have been studied that have the therapeutic potential to interfere with cytokines and other pathways which are activated during sepsis.
Drugs having the properties to neutralize lipopolysaccharides have also been considered.
So far all the large clinical trials with immunomodulating agents (HA1A, E5, anti TNF antibodies, ILra) have been shown to be of marginal or of no benefit.
In certain trials results were indecisive, or mortality was increased which led to discontinue the studies.
In certain other trials, like those on antibodies against TNF, some positive effects were seen in subcategories of patients.
Thus, new trials are on their ways.
So far the results of early trials has forced investigators to re-examine the concept of immunomodulation, and to redefine strategies to optimally use agents in a way that benefits the host, while not putting him at risk.
Recently, percutaneous dilatational tracheotomy (PDT) has become more frequent, since the technique can be mastered relatively easily.
PDT is neither time-consuming nor does it require much personell or material.
Our study seeks to evaluate PDT in terms of its effectivness and practicality on a cardio-surgical ICU.
Recently, two new halogenated volatile anaesthetics, sevoflurane and desflurane, have been approved for clinical use in Germany.
Their low solubility in blood is the most important common property, and this represents the most obvious difference from the inhalational anaesthetics currently used.
Extensive clinical and experimental evaluations have confirmed the superior pharmacokinetic properties predicted.
Both sevoflurane and desflurane provide more rapid emergence from anaesthesia, permit easier titration of the anaesthetic dose during maintenance and offer more rapid recovery from anaesthesia.
For sevoflurane, there are additional advantages: a pleasant odor, negligible airway irritation, and excellent pharmacodynamic characteristics that even provide cardiovascular stability comparable to isoflurane.
A certain disadvantage and source of potential nephrotoxicity result from the metabolism of sevoflurane (2-5%) to anorganic fluoride and degradation to compound A in carbon dioxide absorbents.
The extensive clinical data reported to date have revealed no evidence that sevoflurane has adverse renal effects.
New insight into the pathomechanism of nephrotoxicity associated with either production of fluoride or compound A may well support clinical experience.
Desflurane strongly resists in vivo metabolism and because of this it appears to be devoid of toxicity.
Nevertheless, potential side-effects may result from degradation in dry absorbents and subsequent release of CO, from its extreme pungency and irritating airway effects.
Thus, desflurane is not recommended for induction of anaesthesia, especially in children.
The tendency for desflurane transiently to stimulate sympathetic activity, especially at concentrations above 1.0 MAC, limits its application in patients with cardiac disease.
The doctor in charge, who is generally the medical director, is liable if patients suffer harm through organizational faults within his or her department.
Even the suspicion that an error has arisen as the result of defective organization is enough for the person responsible - that is to say the medical director - to be liable.
For this reason, the doctor in charge must be in a position to recognize structural defects in organization and to correct these by means of staff training.
Every training measure must guarantee specialist standards; this means that the work of doctors with no specialist training and those still in training and working under supervision is guaranteed to be of the same standard and performed with the same degree of meticulous care as that of a qualified specialist.
A legally valid consent from the patient and documentation of the patient information must be accessible at all times.
Operations carried out by doctors in training must be supervised by a qualified specialist; otherwise the doctor in charge is guilty of a defect in organization.
Because of staff shortages it often happens that inexperienced beginners - often doctors doing their practical training - are on call very early on.
In the high-risk specialty of obstetrics it is particularly important that doctors still undergoing practical training can call on an experienced colleague for help at all times.
The changeover from day duty to emergency duty must be organized by the doctor in charge in such a way that the medical staff are rested and that adequate free time is guaranteed.
There must be no friction when cooperation with other disciplines concerned is needed.
Each sector must know its own area of responsibility.
The doctor in charge is resonsible for seeing that his or her staff members are familiar with the use of the medical equipment.
Uniform guidelines will make it possible for the medical director to train his/her staff and prevent systematic organizational defects.
Georg Friedrich Stromeyer (1804- 1876) is generally known as one of the founders of orthopedics and orthopedic surgery and also made many contributions to modern military medicine.
Furthermore, every oral and maxillofacial surgeon in Germany knows him because of the "Stromeyer hook", which is used for elevation of zygomatic arch fractures.
This special aspect as well as Stromeyer's biography is presented in this article from the history of medicine.
Changes in clinical presentation of Crohn's disease (CD), patients' age at the time of disease manifestation and operation, general condition and duration of medical management were investigated in a retrospective study.
395 operations for CD were divided into consecutive groups and analysed.
In an increasing number of cases patients presented with the "fibrostenotic type" rather than the "fistulizing type" of complaints.
The duration of disease and of medical management increased.
Patients in later groups were younger and in better general condition.
We found a rise in frequency of patients with recurrent CD or prior abdominal surgery for other reasons.
Primary surgery for CD increasingly consisted of resection of solitary segments of gut; in the case of recurrence, of multiple, minimal resections.
The average total length of the resected intestine could be significantly reduced.
The complication rate was equal in elective and emergency surgery.
Even among the uncommon aneurysms of the visceral arteries the aneurysm of the pancreaticoduodenalis artery is considered a rarity.
Etiologically, numerous factors must be taken into account, the most significant one being arteriosclerosis.
The clinical presentation is unspecific and ambiguous.
CT and, above all, intra-arterial DSA allow for a diagnosis.
A generous consideration of indicating operative intervention, even in asymptomatic patients, is especially justified because of the imminent risk of rupture.
The preferrable therapy consists of elimination of the aneurysm either conventionally by proximal and distal ligature of the pancreaticoduodenalis artery or endovascularly by embolization.
In the future a treatment with coated stents (TPEG) would also seem possible.
Special attention must be paid to concomitant occlusive disease in other visceral arteries since measures for vessel reconstruction may be required because of intraoperative impairment of the collateral circulation.
We report on the rupture of an aneurysm of the pancreaticoduodenal inferior artery in association with celiac axis occlusion.
Background: Clinical courses of eight patients with urea cycle disorders (deficiencies of carbamylphosphate-synthetase (4), argininosuccinate-synthetase (2) and argininosuccinate-lyase (2) ) are described.
Methods/Therapy: Emergency treatment consisted of benzoate and arginine i. v. as well as peritoneal dialysis and/or modified hemodialysis.
Chronic treatment comprised a low-protein diet and substitution of essential amino acids, of benzoate or phenylbutyrate and of branched-chain amino acids.
Results: Within 72 hours after birth hyperammonemic coma with cerebral edema developed, leading to developmental retardation later in life.
Four patients died between 2 weeks and 4 years of age.
During follow-up, all patients suffered hyperammonemic derangements treated conservatively.
Phenylbutyrate had less gastrointestinal side-effects than benzoate, branched-chain amino acids had favourable effects.
One patient was treated conservatively since birth followed by a normal development.
Conclusions: Neonatal respiratory distress with alkalosis and rapid global deterioration should raise the suspicion of a urea cycle disorder.
Specific therapy as described can be life-saving, although most children exhibit marked developmental delay.
Sodium phenylbutyrate has fewer side-effects than sodium benzoate.
Therapy prior to cerebral edema can prevent complications.
Pronounced osteoporosis of and surrounding the acetabulum commonly leads to early loosening of endoprosthetic hip replacements following implantation.
Large osseous defects in the subimplant bed are the result and the reason why multiple revisions of loosened acetabular cups have to be performed so often in rheumatic surgery.
The defects extend from the cranial to the central; ventral and dorsal anchorage losses may occur in addition to this.
The anchorage of a new implant must be adapted to the individual circumstances.
The new implant must be selected in accordance with point of surgical access, the patient's general status and osseous regenerationability.
In the optimum case, osseous buildup of lost anatomical structures is the preferred method.
If this is not possible, special implants, mostly custom-made prostheses, have to be incorporated.
However, the survival time of the implants is much shorter than in patients with degenerative diseases.
In patients with progressive muscular dystrophy (PMD) invasive electrophysiologic studies can detect hidden intracardiac conduction disturbances.
The aim of this study was a long-term follow-up of these patients.
Twelve consecutive patients (9m, 3f, age 28 +/- 4 yrs) without cardiac symptoms and with normal echocardiographic findings were included in the study.
They suffered from different stages of PMD type Erb (n=4), Becker-Kiener (n=4), Duchenne (n=2) and Landouzy-Déjerine (n=2).
At the beginning of the study all patients underwent an invasive electrophysiologic study (EPS).
The follow-up of 5.5 yrs included regular clinical visits, ECGs, and Holter recordings (every 3 months) as well as an echocardiography every 6 months.
In 4 patients the EPS revealed a hidden interatrial conduction disturbance (AHRS-ACS 120 +/- 18ms), and in 10 pts an infrahisian conduction disturbance was found (HV max.
Conduction defects were seen independently from the type of PMD and the stage of the disease.
During the follow-up the initially hidden interatrial conduction disturbance became evident in the surface ECG in 2 of 4 pts.
One of them developed paroxysmal atrial fibrillation.
Five of 10 pts with an initially hidden infrahisian conduction disturbance developed an AV block grade I-III and in one case additionally a bundle branch block.
Four of these pts - whose PMD showed progression or who developed congestive cardiomyopathy - needed pacemaker implantation because of a first-degree AV block + bifascicular bundle branch block (n=1), a Mobitz II second-degree AV block (n=1) or a third-degree AV block (n=2).
None of the pts with normal findings at the EPS showed abnormal p-waves, an AV block, or an intraventricular conduction disturbance during the follow-up.
We conclude that intracardiac conduction disturbances, especially infrahisian defects including high-degree AV blocks, are a common finding in pts with PMD.
Therefore a regular cardiological screening including an ECG and a Holter recording is reasonable in these patients.
Accidental hypothermia is defined as an unintentional decline in the core temperature below 35 °C and is caused by exposure to cold, drugs, endocrine dysfunction, central nervous system disorders, skin disorders, and trauma.
Depending on the degree of hypothermia, there is a progressive depression of metabolism in each organ system with specific alterations.
Bone is among the most common sites of metastatic disease in cancers of the breast, prostate, and lung.
The decision about systemic therapy depends on the histology, presence and extent of extraskeletal disease, and the performance status of the patient.
For patients with estrogen-receptor-positive breast cancer or prostate cancer, hormonal treatment represents the treatment of choice.
In estrogen-receptor-negative breast cancer, and for patients who have failed hormonal therapy or have liver metastases, chemotherapy should be initiated.
All patients with small-cell lung cancer should receive chemotherapy.
Bone metastases of differentiated thyroid cancers can be treated with radioisotopes.
In non-small-cell lung cancer or renal cell cancer, systemic chemotherapy should be confined to younger patients and patients in good general condition.
Radiologic assessment of responses of skeletal metastases to systemic therapy is often difficult.
New approaches in measuring bone metabolites in urine might prove helpful.
Although most prenatally diagnosed anatomic malformations are best managed after birth, we can presently offer prenatal therapy to an increasing number of fetuses with simple anatomical defects that have predictably devastating developmental consequences.
A condition amenable to prenatal intervention must fulfill a number of conditions.
It must be severe enough to warrant the risks associated with in utero treatment and must be reliably detectable before birth.
Furthermore, the pathophysiology must be reversible by fetal intervention, significantly improving the prognosis over postnatal treatment.
Current indication for prenatal intervention include decompression for obstructive uropathy, temporary tracheal occlusion for congenital diaphragmatic hernia, and tumor debulking for congenital cystic adenomatoid malformation of the lung and sacrococcygeal teratoma.
Prenatal repair of myelomeningocele is currently being developed but remains controversial since this is not a lethal malformation.
Maternal safety remains paramount in considering fetal intervention.
The main associated risks are pre-term labor and preterm premature rupture of membranes.
To reduce maternal morbidity and the risk of prematurity, minimally invasive fetoscopic techniques were developed and are increasingly employed.
These developments will in all probability reduce the importance of open fetal surgery in the future.
Methicillin-resistant S. aureus (MRSA) has become an important cause of severe infection in hospitalized patients all over the world.
In Germany a significant increase of nosocomial infections due to MRSA has occurred during the last 10 years.
Especially elderly patients with chronic illnesses are at increased risk of becoming colonized or infected with MRSA.
This report focuses on epidemiology and therapy of MRSA, and on the recommendations concerning management and prevention of spread of MRSA in hospitals and nursing homes.
During general anaesthesia gas climate significantly is improved by performance of low flow techniques.
Gas climatisation, however, markedly also will be influenced by the temperature loss at, and corresponding water condensation within the hoses, factors which are related to the technical design and material of the patient hose system.
The objective of this prospective study was to investigate 1. how anaesthetic gas climatisation during minimal flow anaesthesia is influenced by the technical design of different breathing hose systems in clinical practice.
2. to investigate, whether a sufficient gas climatisation also can be gained with higher fresh gas flows if that hose system is used, proven beforehand to optimally warming and humidifying the anaesthetic gases.
Introduction: Undifferentiated, embryonal sarcoma is a rare malignant tumour of the liver, the incidence of which is highest in children between 6 and 10 years of age (14.1 %).
Among the primary tumours of the liver in childhood it ranks in third place after hepatocellular carcinoma and focal nodular hyperplasia.
Embryonal sarcoma is much rarer in adults.
To our knowledge, only 18 cases have been published in the last 50 years.
Methods and results: We now present the case of a 29-year-old woman with spontaneous rupture of the liver caused by an undifferentiated sarcoma.
Conclusion: This case report illustrates the possibility of an embryonal sarcoma being the reason for spontaneous rupture of the liver.
The management of this case comprised primary tamponade, interventional embolisation of the feeding artery, and secondary resection under stable conditions.
Substance dependency is one of the most frequent disorders, which can be treated successfully by psychotherapy.
However reasons are discussed, why psychotherapists probably hesitate in treating these patients.
Insufficient psychotherapeutic education concerning dependency, structural problems, expected difficulties with these patients or expected poor treatment outcome may be overcome as well as blind areas in healthprofessionals' perception concerning dependency among their patients and themselves.
Though psychotherapy with addicts is sometimes exhausting, the readiness of psychotherapists to treat patients with substance disorders is increasing.
Diagnosis nowadays is based on the distinction between drug depencency and drug abuse on the one hand and substance induced disorders on the other hand.
Readiness for change and motivation for treatment are basic objects of psychotherapy in these patients.
Therapeutic approaches to deal with this promising aspect of psychotherapy are presented.
They are based on an empathic and clear therapeutic attitude.
They can be easily implemented in different settings.
At the end of the first part of this review in- patient and outpatient settings for the treatment of substance disorders are outlined.
This will be followed in the second part by an outline of different specific psychotherapeutic approaches.
The following experimental study was conducted to develop biocompatible methods of osteosynthesis in fractures of the distal radius and to evaluate their stability.
A model of dorsal wedge osteotomy in the distal radial metaphysis was used to develop the surgical technique and to test the stability of the alternative methods of osteosynthesis.
The concept for this model was based on commercially available materials which were either biodegradable or osteoconductive.
Four different forms of biocompatible osteosynthesis were compared to combined Kirschner wire osteosynthesis (KWO), our preferred method of treatment of unstable Colles fracture.
Biocompatible osteosynthesis was achieved with an invasivity and stability comparable to that of KWO.
In conclusion, injection osteosynthesis exceeded the other biocompatible methods of osteosynthesis in all respects.
Regarding the recent developments in injectable materials for osteosynthesis it offers the best perspective for clinical application.
The "pain in the lower limbs" (growing pain) represent one of the most frequent complaint pictures in the child orthopaedic consulting hour.
The delimitation compared to other diseases is difficult and laborious on account of many differential diagnoses.
Destination of our investigations was it to set up a standardized investigation diagram with recording all differential diagnoses.
In psychotherapy with patients who do not tolerate the conditions of the 'talking cure' because they tend to act instead of verbalizing their experiences interactive entanglements are rather common.
Often this is a consequence of nonverbal gestural behavior that directs interaction in the therapeutic dialogue while the exchange of words has taken a back seat.
The symbolic space of verbal understanding gets lost then.
Gestural behavior does not form an independent communication system as usage of 'body language' suggests.
Instead as permanent concomitant of utterances it has primarily the function of regulating the interaction of patient and psychotherapist.
The surgical treatment of varicous veins demands complete exclusion of the primary recirculation circuit.
The diagnosis is made on the basis of the clinical and ultrasound symptoms, on i.e.
If there is saphenous vein agreement between them, phlebography will yield no additional information concerning the strategy for operation.
The prospective comparative examination of non-invasive diagnostic methods versus phlebography shows different results in 12% of cases for the great saphenous vein and in 3% for the small with a correction of the operative procedure.
In 10 cases of incomplete trunk varicosis, only one diagnosis was correct with non-invasive measures.
This leads to the conclusion that phlebography should be done at the time of the preoperative examination if there are differences between the clinical and ultrasound symptoms.
Undislocated odontoid fractures may lead on the basis of conventional x-rays only to a wrong conclusion with regard to biomechanical aspect of stability.
In this aspect the classification based on Anderson and D'Alonzo takes a high risk to missunderstood the fracture stability and can results in a secondary fracture dislocation.
Therefore it is important to make the decision about operative versus nonoperative treatment on the base of the trauma mechanism.
In this case report we elucidate this problem and the higher risk of anterior approach for correction.
Furthermore a better classification of densfractures will be recommended.
In a period of 4 years between March 1994 and March 1998, 143 patients with gastroesophageal reflux disease (GERD) underwent laparoscopic antireflux surgery.
According to manometric studies 76 patients had a short-floppy Nissen fundoplication, patients with impaired motility or paraesophageal hernias received a hemifundoplication (Toupet = 42, Dor/Thal = 25).
Recurrent reflux symptoms appeared in 6,3 % after mean 16,7 months follow-up (Nissen = 2.6 %, Toupet = 2.3 %, Dor/Thal = 24 %, P < 0.01).
Persistent dysphagia with reoperation occurred in 2.1 % (Nissen = 2.6 %, Toupet = 2.3 %, Dor/Thal = 0 %, n. s.).
The assessment of Visick's score at the latest control showed the following: Visick I = 63.6 %, Visick II = 30.1 %, Visick III = 6.3 %, Visick IV = 0 %.
The outcome of the operation was rated "excellent" or "good" by 91.6 % of the patients.
In contrast to auditory brainstem potentials (ABR), a more apically defined generation of middle latency evoked potentials (MLR) can be assumed due to the longer integration time present.
To date, the effect of stimulus frequency spectra on MLR has not been completely known.
By using masking with high-pass filtered white noise in 12 normal-hearing adults, we measured the dependence of amplitude and latency of ABR and MLR on filter frequency.
No differences were found between the masking effects for ABR and MLR evoked by tone bursts of 0.5 and 2 kHz.
The high-pass masking of click stimuli showed a greater influence on the amplitude and latency of the ABR than on MLR.
These different qualities have to be considered clinically when evaluating the methods and results of hearing testing with acoustic evoked potentials.
Our findings show that MLR evoked by tone bursts should be used for the frequency selective diagnosis of hearing thresholds, especially in low- frequency ranges.
Objectives: To clarify the incidence of sudden arrythmic death and associated risk factors in patients after orthotopic heart transplantation (HTx).
Background: Some reports indicate a significant rate of sudden death in heart transplant recipients limiting long-term success of the operation.
Incidence, underlying risk factors, etiologies, and methods for prediction or prevention of sudden death are poorly defined.
Methods: Retrospective analysis of our cohort of 120 cardiac allograft recipients surviving the perioperative phase out of a total of 142HTx patients of the years 1984-1999.
Clinical events (death, mode of death, Re-HTx, resuscitation) were noted and analyzed by the Kaplan-Meier method and related to the patients' characteristics by multivariate analysis.
Sudden death in or out of hospital was defined as death within one hour of symptoms or unwittnessed death.
Clinical and postmortem findings (autopsies are available in 12/18 sudden death patients) were correlated to the mode of death.
Results: During a mean follow-up interval of 4.6 +/- 3.5 years, 45 patients died (38%).
The mode of death was non-sudden in 27 inpatients.
18 deaths were sudden, 14 of these out of hospital.
In addition there were three cardiac arrests with successful resuscitations, one of those patients died three month later suddenly, giving a number of a total of 21 cardiac arrests in 20HTx patients.
The actuarial risk of cardiac arrest was 20% after 6 and 40% after 12 years.
Based on postmortem analysis the etiologies of the events were attributed to transplant vasculopathy in 15 patients, rejection in 5 patients (International Society for Heart and Lung Transplantation grade >3A), and to unknown reasons in one.
All three patients successfully resuscitated from cardiac arrest had documented bradycardic events (2xtotal AV block, 1xsinus arrest).
Pacemakers were implanted in these patients.
One of those died suddenly 2 months later.
Significantly more HTx patients dying suddenly are smokers, had a lower left ventricular ejection fraction, and worse hemodynamics.
QRS width and PR interval were significantly broadened in patients with transplant vasculopathy and cardiac arrest.
In three cases, a decrease in heart rate variability, the occurence of sustained VT, and ST segment depressions prior to the cardiac arrest could be demonstrated.
Conclusions: Sudden death occurs at a substantial rate after HTx.
As HTx patient numbers are rising constantly, sudden cardiac death in this population will represent a significant problem.
In our patients about 75% of the arrests can be attributed to graft-vasculopathy and one quarter to acute rejection.
Diagnostic strategies have to be developed to detect patients at risk.
Interestingly, some events may be caused from bradyarrhythmic rhythm disturbances.
Introduction: Traumatic dislocation is the most severe ligamentous injury of the knee.
The indications for operative and conservative treatment are still controversial.
Methods and results: From 1974 to 1994, 38 patients with documented knee dislocation were treated operatively in our department.
Thirty-four of these patients were followed up for 3-16 years (mean: 8.6 years).
In 29 cases of the follow-up group, reconstruction of both cruciate ligaments was performed.
In the remaining cases the cruciate ligaments were left alone.
At the time of follow-up, 90 % of the patients showed good knee stability, but 90 % had lack of motion as well.
Post-traumatic osteoarthritis was mostly mild to moderate.
Thirty-five percents of the patients achieved excellent to good results in the Lysholm Score.
Conclusions: Positive prognostic factors were an age less than 40 years at the time of the accident, a low-energy trauma, e. g., a sports-related injury, early reconstruction of both cruciate ligaments, and initial postoperative functional treatment.
Huntington's disease (HD) is member of a growing family of neurodegenerative diseases which are caused by a CAG-Triplet expansion in the coding region of their respective genes.
The results of the research of the last years is very suggestive of a common pathomechanisms of all these diseases even though their clinical appearance may be quite different.
The development of new animal models by transferring the human gene defect into the mouse genome has led to the finding of so-called intranuclear inclusion bodies.
This new observation allowed to come closer to solving the problem how this genetic defect causes neurodegeneration.
Recent studies on transgenic HD mice could also demonstrate a possible connection between the genetic defect and glutamate exitotoxicity in the neurodegenerative process of HD which had been emphasized by earlier animal models of the disease.
Transgenic animal models of HD will have an important impact on the understanding of the disease mechanisms and may contribute to a faster development and testing of new therapeutic approaches.
Background: The Whipple operation (PD) is the standard operation in patients with cancer of the head of the pancreas and the periampullary region.
However, the pylorus-preserving duodenopancreatectomy (PPPD) is supposed to be superior in gastrointestinal function.
Methods: In a prospective randomized trial (October 1994-October 1998) PD and PPPD were compared in terms of global and gastrointestinal quality of life, operation time, duration of hospital stay, transfusions and perioperative morbidity.
Quality of life was analyzed under standardized conditions (EORTC-QLQ-30) pre- and postoperatively (weeks 2, 6, 12, 24, 36, 48, and 60).
Results: A duodenopancreatectomy was performed in 48 patients because of cancer of the head of the pancreas (n = 38) and the periampullary region (n = 10) (PD, n = 24; PPPD, n = 24).
The PD and PPPD groups did not differ according to age, gender or UICC stage.
Operation time was shorter in the PPPD group (206  +/-  48 vs 306  +/-  54 min) (P < 0.05).
Morbidity did not differ between the two groups (PPPD 20 % vs PD 30 %, P > 0.05).
While there was no difference in global quality of life, gastrointestinal quality of life was postoperatively increased in the PPPD group regarding appetite, nausea and diarrhea (P < 0.05).
While the preoperative body weight was reached after 6 months in 85 % of the PPPD group (n = 20), this was true in only 60 % of the PD-group (n = 14) (P < 0.05).
Conclusion: PPPD seems to be associated with a better postoperative gastrointestinal quality of life than PD.
Oxygen uptake (V.O2) and carbon dioxide elimination (V.CO2) can be measured with an indirect calorimeter; this method is well established in routine monitoring of ICU patients to evaluate metabolic state as a reflection of stress.
In various experimental studies it was demonstrated that anaesthetics can influence whole-body metabolism.
The purpose of this study was to examine whether indirect calorimetry can be used intraoperatively during routine anaesthesia and whether presumable changes in metabolism can be detected immediately.
Abdominal aortic cross-clamping changes circulation, nutritional supply of the lower extremities and thus V.O2 and V.CO2.
We therefore used this operation for our study.
For certain indications, anterior fusion of the lumbar spine is a standard operation.
The surgeon specializing in operations on the vertebral column must leam to utilize the advantages of laparoscopic surgery.
However, an absolute must before applying the technique to humans is adequate training in its use in living animals.
For this purpose, the pig is a highly suitable model.
The surgical team comprises a surgeon experienced in spinal procedures, an abdominal surgeon with expertise in laparoscopic surgery and an experienced cameraman.
In the animal model, a change in position - organ preparation from the cranial direction, a suprasymphysial approach to the vertebrae - has proved expedient.
Operational interventions can be planned and simulated accurately with the help of a three-dimensional reconstruction of the anatomical bone structures, created from the tomographic data of a patient.
Computer-assisted navigation systems or robotic systems can assist the intraoperative realization of the planned intervention and may support the spatial orientation within the operational field.
The desmoplastic type of the squamous cell carcinoma (DSCC) of the skin is an entity which is readily distinguished by light microscopy.
The DSCC has fine branches surrounded by a desmoplastic stroma and shows in some cases typical perineural, perivascular and widespread intradermal invasion (maximum 6 cm!).
This type accounts for 8.2% (n=44) of our collective of 594 squamous cell carcinomas (SCC) of the skin and vermilion border.
Clinically DSCC look like other malignant epithelial tumors of the skin.
All tumors were followed up for at least 3 years (maximum 10 years).
The local recurrence rate was high (24.3%) even though micrographic surgery was carried out.
The rate of local or regional metastasis was also very high (22.7%).
In comparison the recurrence rate and the rate of metatasis of the remaining common 91.8% SCC's (n=550) was low: 2.6% and 3.8%, respectively.
The DSCC seems to be identical with the so called neurotropic SCC, the fine stranded SCC or the SCC with perineural invasion which have a high rate of local recurrence and metastasis as well, but DSCC is a better generic histopathologic term for the entire group.
The DSCC is best treated with micrographic surgery and wider safety margins than any other type and should be followed up very frequently.
In the final stage of amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS) the majority of patients develop chronic respiratory failure due to respiratory muscle weakness.
The interaction between the patient with ALS and the physician should be characterized by continuous communication, especially with respect to the prospect of ventilatory failure and for support.
The patient and his family must be informed thoroughly about the natural history and the prognosis of ALS, depending on the individual disease process.
Already in the early stage of the disease coping strategies should be discussed so that imminent respiratory emergencies can be handled.
If ALS patients are not informed about the acute respiratory insufficiency they run the risk of having to be intubated and mechanically ventilated over a long term.
Background: The advent of multidetector CT (MDCT) constitutes a quantum leap creating a wealth of new opportunities in medical imaging.
However, while the basic principles of spiral CT still apply, we are now challenged to rethink our strategies in planning a CT study to take full advantage of the increased capabilities of MDCT.
Extracorporeal photophoresis (ECP), a therapeutic modality that has been under investigation for some years, is based on separation of a leucocyte/lymphocyte-enriched cell fraction from the peripheral blood, extracorporeal treatment of the cells with 8-MOP/UVA and subsequent reinfusion of the cells in the patient.
Its main effects seem to consist in changes to the immunologic behaviour of the photoinactivated/modulated cells.
The immune response of the host is obviously stimulated by this treatment.
ECP is normally performed for 4 h per day on 2 consecutive days every 4 weeks.
The treatment is well tolerated and causes few side effects.
In our department, 1210 ECP treatments were administered to 41 patients between 1990 and 1994 and a preliminary evaluation was performed.
These patients included 21 with cutaneous T-cell lymphoma (CTCL), 10 with progressive systemic scleroderma, 4 with chronic graft-versus-host disease and 1 each with pemphigus vulgaris, epidermolysis bullosa acquisita, lupus erythematosus and cutaneous mucinosis.
Patients with erythroderma and preserved immunocompetence achieved the best responses of all patients with CTCL.
A treatment combining ECP with rlFN-, PUVA and/or radiation was also successful in patients with tumour-stage CTCL and lymph node involvement.
Progressive systemic scleroderma responded in more than 50% of our cases.
Treatment results were impressive in 4 patients with chronic graft-versus-host disease presenting with sclerodermatous and lichenoid changes of the skin and mucous membranes.
A clear improvement was also observed in the patient with pemphigus vulgaris refractory to standard therapies and in another patient with scleromyxoedema (Arndt-Gottron syndrome).
The effectiveness of ECP seems to be quite well established in CTCL, but remains to be examined in autoimmune dermatoses.
ECP is an attractive addition to the dermatological therapies available but our experience is still preliminary.
Opportunistic infections after long-term treatment with azathioprine (AZA) have not been noted in patients with myasthenia gravis (MG).
We report on a 56-year-old woman with generalized MG who presented with cytomegalovirus infection after being treated with AZA for 17 years.
The indication for immunosuppressive treatment in MG should be regularly reconfirmed, particularly since at least 50% of patients can discontinue AZA after two to four years without risk of exacerbation.
Failure to find the gallbladder at the usual or most common atypical sites during surgery for cholecystolithiasis is a rare but known problem.
Although ultrasonography has 95 % sensitivity for the diagnosis of cholelithiasis, occasionally a small contracted gallbladder with stones and chronic cholecystitis will be difficult to visualize and can lead to erroneous interpretation.
We report on the case of a patient presenting with abdominal colic and ultrasonographically confirmed cholecystolithiasis.
During laparoscopic cholecystectomy, the gallbladder could not be detected.
After laparoscopic staging followed by endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography and abdominal computed tomography, agenesis of the gallbladder was confirmed.
This method can be considered for diagnosis of gallbladder agenesis without the need for laparotomy and thorough exploration.
Right colon diverticulitis, representing 1-3,6 % of cases of diverticular disease is an uncommon cause of right lower quadrant pain.
Its presentation is difficult to distinguish from acute appendicitis.
Patients are between 35 and 50 years old, have a history of 2-3 days of abdominal pain and few gastrointestinal symptoms.
The diagnosis is best confirmed by computed tomography and colonoscopy.
Conservative treatment is justified in uncomplicated disease, whereas perforations, abcesses and inflammatory tumors require resection.
We describe the cases of six patients treated at our institution from 1991 to 1996.
Presentation, geographic variations, diagnostic procedures and management are discussed.
Malignant melanoma is the most important differential diagnosis in both clinical and histologic examination of melanocytic nevi.
UV exposure with an erythemagenic dose and mechanical irritation of melanocytic nevi are able to induce reversible morphologic changes which simulate malignant melanoma.
These changes are associated with an increased expression of HMB-45 antigen.
In addition, an increased proliferation and repair activity is observed after UV exposure.
The increased number of melanocytes located in suprabasal layers of the epidermis is accompanied by a change in keratinocyte adhesion molecule expression.
The UV light is also able to influence the adhesive properties of melanocytes in vitro.
Therefore, both keratinocyte-derived factors and direct influence of UV on the melanocyte system are probably responsible for the morphologic changes.
While these exogenously evoked changes are reversible, the potential biologic relevance - especially a possible role in the initiation of the carcinogenesis cascade - reguires clarification.
Objectives Minimally invasive surgical procedure for removal of the trochanteric bursa and, if necessary, exostosectomy and/or fixation of the iliotibial tract at the greater trochanter.
The treatment of osteonecrosis of the femoral head involves a continuum based on a radiographic spectrum of disease.
Core decompression or pharmacological agents can be utilized for the earliest small or medium-sized pre-collapsed lesions.
For these types of lesions, osteotomy has been tried by various authors with moderate success.
For small or medium lesions that are post-collapse, various bone grafting procedures have been used.
This approach should be tempered with a look at the articular cartilage if this is damaged or the lesion is large.
Limited femoral resurfacing can be used for hips that do not have acetabular involvement.
If there is acetabular involvement, total hip replacement remains the treatment of choice.
Guillain Barré syndrome (GBS) is an acute, inflammatory, demyelinating disease of the peripheral nerve system.
Clinical hallmarks are symmetric muscle paralysis, areflexia and pronouced autonomic disturbances.
Respiratory failure and cardiovascular instability are the main reasons for intensive care support in patients with GBS.
The present report of a 33 year old man with Miller-Fisher syndrome, a variant of the GBS, discusses the management of patients with GBS in the intensive care unit.
The immunocytological detection of disseminated epithelial cells in bone marrow in patients with breast cancer has been performed at many hospitals and institutes since the early 1980s.
Despite numerous publications in this field, it has not been possible to standardize the method and  establish the ideal antibody, either nationally or internationally.
Molecular biological methods using PCR technology could extend the diagnostic spectrum.
However, one of the major problems in breast cancer is the lack of a disease-specific marker gene.
As a result, immunocytology is still the standard procedure for tumour cell detection.
Objective: We report our initial experience with an improved model of the laryngeal mask airway, the intubating laryngeal mask airway (ILMA, commercial name Fastrach), which was designed by A.I.J.
Brain to improve blind endotracheal intubation through a laryngeal mask.
For several years it has been argued that a chest tube should be placed at the scene of an accident if thoracic trauma is suspected.
However, during emergency treatment in hospital it has been observed that a high number of such tubes have been placed incorrectly.
To validate this impression, we conducted a retrospective analysis of the clinical course of 33 trauma victims who had had chest tubes placed at the scene of accident.
It was found that 39.4% of the chest tubes were placed completey incorrectly and 21.2% required some correction; 39.4% were placed correctly.
In two cases (6.1%) life-threatening complications developed because of the chest tube, necessitating a thoracotomy in 1 patient and repeated pericardial punction in the other.
Based on the results of our study we believe that a more critical attitude should be adopted to the placement of chest tubes at the scene of the accident.
Based upon the observation that some current approaches of quality assurance do not really come up to the specific characteristics of different psychotherapeutic settings, this article discusses quality assurance from the perspective of inpatient group psychotherapy.
It differentiates issues of structural quality (e.g.
the importance of the institutional frame, rules for indication, or treatment concepts), process quality with special consideration of problems connected with short term group treatment, and outcome quality, which in order to be assured needs the development of methods which reflect the group setting adequately.
We report on a case of extensive intraabdominal calcifications resulting from previous bacterial peritonitis.
The patient suffered from an obstructive ileus.
Relaparotomy was performed and the calcifications resected.
To avoid recurrence, radiotherapy (15 Gy) and indomethacin were given.
A literature review revealed only two cases of intraabdominal calcifications following peritonitis.
In Germany there is still an urgent need for action in regard to screening for breast cancer.
The announcement of research projects for mammography screening proves this.
The following reports the results of the Munich field study.
In 2 years, 2489 breast cancer cases were registered (status 6/98).
Screening data were available for 1319 patients.
The reduction in mortality, found in randomized studies, due to mammography in women over 50 years old was confirmed.
A relative reduction of 44.8% in 10-year mortality could be estimated through mammography and 25.1% through palpation, in comparison with "doing nothing".
We could also estimate the participation of screening and the used methods in the Munich region.
If the mammographies carried out today were used at 2-year intervals for women aged between 50 and 70 years, then the mammography screening could be performed with no additional costs for 70% of the women.
The known facts regarding the population-based mortality and regarding the acceptance of the palpation screening and frequency of mammography are additional aspects for inclusion in the discussion of what research projects in Germany are and what they should fulfill.
Insufficiency after anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) reconstruction is a typical complication.
Between 1 January 1992 and 31 December 1997 a total of 604 operations at the ACL were performed in the traumatology department of Nuremberg hospital.
During the same period 48 "transplant failures" were treated.
There were various reasons for the failure of the transplant, some of them technical, occurring during the operation or during aftercare.
Another reason for a re-rupture of the transplant was by trauma.The different reasons for the failure of the transplant were analysed in our patient population.
The 48 patients were classified into five groups depending on the primary operation and the means of treatment (I = ACL sutures, II = artificial ligament, III = semitendinosus tendon, IV and V = ipsi- or contralateral bone-patellar-bone graft harvest after ACL reconstruction), so that the different ways of treatment were better comparable.
Of the 48 patients 36 were followed up over an average of 2 1/2 years using the Lysholm scores and the OAK scores.
The total score of the 36 patients was 81 points and can be valued as good using the evaluation scale of Lysholm and Gillquist.
Using the OAK score we found an average of 71 to 81 points in the different groups; results in the group with the ipsilateral bone-tendon-bone graft harvest after ACL reconstruction were the worst.
The totalscore using the OAK score was 74 points and was considered "moderate".
The score results were discussed and compared with the current literature.
In this case report, we focus on the importance of scurvy as a differential diagnosis in a newborn presenting with swollen legs.
Scurvy is rare in highly developed countries and often overlooked.
Medical history, clinical symptoms and radiological findings are crucial for diagnosis.
The diagnosis is confirmed by successful treatment with ascorbic acid.
Hemangiomas of the skull base are rare neoplasms and are easily misdiagnosed as acoustic neuromas when occurring in the internal auditory canal.
Among these tumors, ossifying hemangiomas are characterized histologically be newly formed bone tissue within their substance.
We describe a 26-year old female patient who presented with left-sided sensorineural hearing loss and tinnitus.
T2-weighted magnetic resonance imaging demonstrated a bright space-occupying lesion of the internal auditory canal with extension to the geniculate ganglion.
Bony erosions of the internal auditory canal were proved by high-resolution computed tomography.
A hemangioma was suspected preoperatively and was resected via a middle cranial fossa approach.
Histologically, new bone formations were found in a cavernous hemangioma.
In general, radiologic findings can suggest a hemangioma of the internal auditory canal and help to differentiate it from acoustic neuroma.
Based on the histological findings of intratumoral bone formation, the hemangioma in our patient was classified as an ossifying hemangioma.
However, reactive bone formation at the borders of a tumor in the internal auditory canal can also be mistaken as new intratumoral bone formation.
Myocardial ischemia results in myocardial dysfunction.
Recovery may be delayed ("stunning"), or persistent if perfusion remains reduced ("hibernation") and ischemia may go on to necrosis, thus, contributing to chronic heart failure.
In addition, myocardium not directly affected by ischemia may undergo adaptive processes like hypertrophy and dilatation, which may result in chronic left heart failure.
This process is characterized by hemodynamic, neurohumoral, and progressive morphologic changes of the heart which are closely interrelated.
Hemodynamic changes basically consist of an increase in left ventricular filling pressure and a decrease in global ejection fraction, and, in most cases years after myocardial infarction, in an increase in systemic vascular resistance and right atrial pressure.
Neurohumoral changes consist of an increase in plasma catecholamines, atrial natriuretic factor and vasopressin, and in an activation of the renin-angiotensin-system.
Plasma endothelin-1 was recently reported to be increased in patients with heart failure, and prognosis was related to endothelin levels.
Diminished response of vessels to endothelium (EDRF/NO) dependent vasodilatation suggests impairment of vascular endothelium in heart failure.
Local changes of cardiac neurohumoral systems could contribute to structural changes of the heart, e.g., systemic activation to hemodynamic changes.
Structural changes of the heart are characterized by an increase in volume and thickness of surviving myocardium and an expansion of ischemic and necrotic myocardium.
Molecular control of these processes which include various cell types, such as cardiomyocytes and cardiofibroblasts, are currently an issue of intense research and could result in specific therapeutic importance.
Postoperative infection in the locomotor system may lead to malpractice suits.
The aim of the study was to determine the success rate of these claims and the type of expert-confirmed medical negligence so that strategies for avoiding such negligence can be offered.
A total of 261 decrees concerning suspected malpractice after postoperative infection in the locomotor system were retrospectively evaluated.
Of these, 43.7 % claims were successful.
The most frequent type of negligence was late diagnosis (34.2 %), followed by inconsistant treatment (27.2 %) and insufficient surgical revision (5.3 %).
In 33.3 %, combined types of negligence were found.
Most frequently, negligence was suspected after infection following hand surgery and internal fixation of long bones.
The highest success rate of claims was seen after puncture of joints (69.2 %).
Insufficient documentation was confirmed in 15.3 %.
The majority of negligence resulted from diagnostic and therapeutic doubts, which could be avoided, e. g., by a clear definition of infection, consultation of a second opinion, a 2nd-look operation, undelayed and radical surgical revision, painstaking follow-up and disciplined documentation.
Abstract   Patient satisfaction plays an increasing part in the analysis of the outcome of medical treatment.
The aim of the study was to compare health-related quality of life in patients with abdominal aortic aneurysm after endovascular or conventional surgery.
A total of 40 patients were included (20 treated by endovascular and 20 by conventional surgery).
A questionnaire with 28 items similar to the SF-36 was answered during scheduled appointments.
On the third postoperative day, the conventionally treated patients were more frequently confined to bed (80% vs. 32%) and complained of intervention-related pain (90% vs. 42%) and incisional pain (26% vs. 15%); 55% of the patients suffered from obstipation (vs. 5% of the endovascular group).
Furthermore, the preoperative psychological stress seemed to be intensified.
In comparable percentage, both the endovascular and conventionally treated patients were limited in social activities perioperatively.
Sexual dysfunction was more frequent in the conventional group (33% vs. 13% three months postoperative).
In addition, the conventionally treated patients were more limited in their physical activities (25% vs. 40%) and had more fear of ambulation (35% vs. 6%).
The patients treated by an endovascular approach complained about frequent examinations (39% vs. 5%) that were often related to X-ray exposure (67% vs. 20%).
All of the conventionally operated patients had a sense of improvement (vs. 89% of the endovascular group); nevertheless only 28% felt completely healthy, compared to 11% of the endovascular treated patients.
Advantages of the endovascular treated patients were "short hospital stay", "decreased pain", "smaller scars", and a "shorter confinement to bed".
After intervention the conventionally treated patients were more limited in almost all quality-of-life aspects.
After 3 months, differences between the groups decreased except for sexual dysfunction and limited physical activities.
The patients treated by endovascular surgery complained more about frequent X-ray examinations than the conventionally treated group.
In the majority of ventilated patients endotracheal intubation is required only for a short time period.
However, about 20% of the patients require prolonged mechanical ventilation.
Apart from dysfunction of the central nervous system with a reduced respiratory drive, the vast majority of patients being difficult to wean suffer from either an increased load or a decreased capacity of their respiratory muscles.
Furthermore, beside compromised respiratory mechanics other causes of difficult weaning are, e.g., left heart failure, inadequate sedation, neuropsychiatric issues, malnutrition and aspiration.
The mere application of a consistent weaning strategy (independent from its concrete content) leads to an improved success rate.
In this article three essential aspects of a weaning strategy are dealt with: 1) The concept of interventions (in particular focusing on mechanical ventilation modes unloading respiratory muscles), 2) pathophysiologically based parameters to predict weaning success or failure and 3) organisation of the T-tube trials.
A new approach in weaning of long-term ventilated patients is non-invasive mechanical ventilation (NMV).
Compared to invasive mechanical ventilation NMV aims at reducing weaning time, decreasing complication rate and improving prognosis.
Finally, the last section addresses terminal weaning.
The psychoanalytic cure is characterized by a basic antinomy of time and time-lessness.
Freud based the daily psychoanalytic work on the order of the mechanic clock (the time of the machine) to regulate a relationship which is unique in our culture.
The temporal order of the cure responds to the logic of the temporal path.
On the opposite, in the world of the unconscious the familiar concepts of cause and effect as well as of before and after are abolished.
"Symmetrical madness" prevails (Matte Blanco).
The temporal core of the analytic situation is bi-logical.
This ambiguity is reflected in the technical principles.
Free association breaks through the logic of the temporal path, again and again.
There are, however, different defence strategies defusing its unforeseeability.
The tension between the time that determines the analytic setting and the timelessness of free association gets once again a process of temporal order going.
Present social changes and in connection with them the changed time strategies endanger the temporal order of the analytic cure.
Several historical reports focusing on the heredity of migraine, as well as recent studies on its epidemiology and molecular biology, have revealed evidence for a decisive role of genetic factors in the aetiopathogenesis of familial migraine.
Indeed, family studies, segregation analyses and twin studies have shown that genetic factors play an important role in disposition towards migraine but could not explain the entire aetiopathogenesis.
The influence of extragenetic factors, however, remains mostly unknown.
Recent linkage analyses have provided evidence for genetic heterogeneity.
A locus for Familial Hemiplegic Migraine (FHM), the only known type of migraine that follows autosomal-dominant transmission, has been linked to chromosome 19p13 but genetic heterogeneity has also been shown, i. e. different types of migraine could be excluded from this locus.
Further investigations should concentrate on identifying the FHM gene on chromosome 19p13, on linkage analyses with markers for different susceptibility genes, and on genomic analyses of highly informative pedigrees.
This would lead to further clues to the pathogenesis underlying migraine and, thus, to therapeutic developments.
Radiographic findings suggestive of osteopenia and osteoporosis are frequently encountered in daily medical practice and can result from a wide spectrum of diseases ranging from highly prevalent causes such as postmenopausal and involutional osteoporosis to very rare endocrinologic and hereditary or acquired disorders.
As bone mass is lost, changes in the trabecular and cortical bone structure occur.
The changes that are visible on conventional radiographs may give specific information on the etiology of the underlying disease.
Even though conventional radiography is indispensable in the differential diagnosis of osteopenia and osteoporosis, visual assessment of bone mass and its changes is subjective and strongly depends on the radiographic technique.
With radiogrammetry and radiographic absorptiometry two methods exist that rely on conventional radiography and allow for a quantification of bone mass.
This article describes the author's experience during the 1-year AGA Pittsburgh fellowship from 1 April 1996 to 31 March 1997.
The article is focused on the work in the Musculoskeletal Research Center and the Center for Sports Medicine of the Department of Orthopedic Surgery in Pittsburgh.
The author describes projects on the biomechanics of the cruciate ligaments, using robotic technology.
Organizational and social aspects of the life in Pittsburgh are discussed.
The different subgroups of hypercalciuria cannot be separated clearly by the Pak calcium-load test.
To improve the diagnosis and therapy we examined all relevant parameters of calcium metabolism in 32 patients with calcium urolithiasis and hypercalciuria (> 6.25 mmol/day).
We also conducted bone mineral density measurements as well as the Pak calcium-load test.
In most cases the pathophysiological constellations which Pak takes as the basis for his classification of hypercalciuria could not be shown.
To date, diagnostics only insufficiently explains the genesis of hypercalciuria (except pHPT).
As a consequence, a therapeutic problem arises: a low-calcium diet should not be generally recommended, since some patients may develop osteopenia.
From our investigation the following diagnostic and therapeutic conclusions can be drawn: (1) Hypercalciuria in primary hyperparathyroidism should be treated by surgical removal of the adenoma.
(2) The parathormone-independent osteogenic form should be treated with thiazides.
(3) Hypercalciuria with increased 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D should be treated by low-calcium diet.
A 58-year old man with wilson's disease sustained a bilateral spontaneous rupture of the quadriceps tendon.
The histological investigation showed advanced degeneration of tendon structure and cupper deposits.
After tenosuture the patient had complete cure with full range of movement.
We discuss about relation of wilson x s disease, cupper deposits and degenerative changes of tendon tissue.
Within the framework of the National Health Interview and Examination Survey 1998 the Short Form Questionnaire SF-36 has been applied to measure the health related quality of life (HRQOL).
This opened more opportunities than simply creating a new normative sample for the German adult population.
Thus, the very complex interdependence between morbidity, satisfaction, risk factors, health related behaviours, social status, age and sex on the one side and the subjective assessment of health related quality of life on the other hand may be investigated.
First results of the Survey data are presented which open the discussion of the possibilities and limits of the SF-36 instrument for measuring health related quality of life at the population level.
The von Willebrand's Disease affects about 1-3 % of the population and it is undiagnosed in most people.
Originally described by the Finish physician Erik von Willebrand in 1926 this disorder is associated with mucous membran bleeding including epistaxis, hypermenorhoea and excessive bleeding from surgery and dental procedures.
In von Willebrands disease the patients have a quantitative or qualitative abnormality in the von Willebrand Factor (vWF) which has two major functions: it serves by bridging between platelets and injury site in the blood vessel wall, and it circulates as a complex with factor VIII, protecting it from rapid degradation.
More than 20 different types and subtypes of vWD have been described but almost all patients can be classified as having 1 of the 2 most common types of vWD.
About 70 % of patients have type 1 and about 10-20 % present themself with type 2A and 2B vWD type 3 in about 10 %.
By taking a clinical history of bleeding it is important to think about vWD and to make the appropriate diagnosis.
If the vWD is suspected diagnostic tests should include an activated partial thromboplastin time, bleeding time, factor VIII:C, Ristocetin cofactor, and vWF antigen.
Additional testing of ristocetin induced plattlet adhesion (RIPA), the multimeric structure and collagen binding test and gen-analysis allow diagnosing the different types of v. Willebrand Disease.
The treatment of choice in mild forms is the synthetic agent desmopressin.
In patients with severe type 1, type 2B, 2N and type 3 or in people who do not response to desmopressin, the appropriate treatment is a factor VIII concentrate that is rich of vWF.
Until now no recommendations in the orthopaedic literature have been found regarding diagnosis and treatment of vWS patients.
Based on the experience with 43 orthopaedic patients presenting vWD over the last 15 years a contemporary guideline for the successful perioperative management of vWD in orthopaedic surgery is presented.
In a close collaboration between the orthopaedic surgeon and the specialized haemostaseologist every invasive procedure in patients with vWD can be undertaken without the risk of excessive bleeding.
Patients with a prior myocardial infarction (MI) have a high risk of perioperative reinfarction compared with the normal population (5%-8% vs. 0.1%-0.7%) [10].
According to Rao [13], a reduction of this risk is possible when patients are monitored invasively and all haemodynamic parameters are kept within the physiological range.
In most institutions it is not feasible to treat patients as Rao recommended: this would overstrain both hospital structure and financial resources.
We studied the incidence of perioperative MI and other cardiac events in patients with prior MI.
During the study period the anaesthesia and intensive care methods of our institution were neither changed nor influenced.
In addition to this clinical evaluation, we performed perioperative Holter electrocardiographic monitoring and measured serum levels of the recently introduced marker troponin T (parts II and III).
Small basal cell carcinomas of the trunk are usually regarded as relatively harmless.
In contrast, large and ulcerating basal cell carcinomas may become a therapeutic challenge with a less favourable prognosis and high risk of recurrence.
The development of mutilating giant basal cell carcinomas appears less due to the biological aggressive character of the tumors, but rather to the patients' attitude of neglect.
The case of a 62-year-old patient, featuring such attitude, demonstrates how a common basal cell carcinoma of the trunk can grow over a period of years to a troublesome ulcerating tumor.
This epidemiologic, retrospective follow-up mortality study is based on the data gathered in the department of forensic medicine at the University Hospital of Johann Wolfgang Goethe University in Frankfurt/Main.
